Back it: Derry win. Cork defended well against Rovers but were very tame in going forward. It’s clear they are missing the threat of Graham Cummins. Derry will want to put the Shels lost behind them.
What new plants are you going to grow??
I was hoping more along the lines of 3…
14-What are the flowers that you believe describe your personality and how?
Part way through the show someone from the audience jumps up and throws something at the stage before storming off. There's a pause in the action, a technician sweeps something from the floor and the show resumes. As a counterpoint it's very strong and has me thinking along some parallels during the next scene. I'm sure its designed that way, and very effective.
McGwire was absolutely correct - steroids didn't swing his bat, nor were they a part of his hand eye coordination. But they did keep his body from breaking down. They made him strong enough to complete all the work he needed to put in TO swing his bat better and work on that hand eye coordination! Without the drugs he couldn't have put in the workload necessary to perfect those things - and THAT is why they enhanced his performance!
We started 2DreamRunners to build a network of people participating in healthy living lifestyles with an emphasis on helping others! It is our hope that we can gather energy from many and focus it on helping others through the positive energy of health and wellness. Our fundraising journey appropriately starts on the new courses of the event that so inspired us last year – the BMO Vancouver Marathon. The Vancouver Marathon has a long history of supporting charity organizations in British Columbia. This year is no different with the Marathon having 5 charity partners: the BC Cancer Foundation, Canuck Place, the Heart and Stroke Foundation, Ronald McDonald House BC or the Greater Vancouver Food Bank Society.
3 studio
Facebook and other self-contained, monitored sites became the safe place to meet. Who wants to be harassed by total strangers? When does "arguing" end, and actual harassment, hatred and stalking begin? (And who decides?)
So we started taking the younger one to day care first, and then crossing
Of the understanding of its seed’s resolution.
3. She has self published and sold some patterns.
Dry Dock Brewing Co. U-Boat
He’d got his girl in trouble and the wedding cards were played
Switchin' - 8.0M
And his good sword rust; -
Have you taken a selfie?
We had a glorious mix of mist on the higher parts of Hadrian’s Wall and brilliant sunshine in the valleys. Enjoy the views!
You deserve to feel good about yourself!
THE DARK IS RISING by Susan Cooper is a masterpiece. It’s so big and sweeping and strange and yet so controlled and focused and human. She makes epic look easy.
Somehow between the past few weeks of being up then down then up then down, last Saturday I hit a down and can't even seem to try to get up. I called in sick to work, life, and trying to figure out exactly how to check back in because all I want to do is throw my tantrum...
I colored them in using Copic markers and added some Liquid Pearls all around them. The gorgeous designer paper is by K&Co called Merry Weather. The beautiful resin frame is my Melissa Frances, I just added some loose pearls and flowers. The flowers are by Wild Orchid Crafts and prima. I tucked a cute little stick pin that has a cute little butterfly behind the flowers. The heart charm is from my stash. The blue ribbon and lace trim is by Recollections and I hand dyed the seam binding.
Another approach this dad could have taken was to give his son the choice of getting dressed at home or taking his clothes in a bag and getting dressed at school. Allowing our children to accomplish their own tasks in their own way is a gift which will help them grow.
A terrifying incident tears open the social and political fabric of multi-cultural Leeds. The dramatic fallout plummet’s Joe and Rachel into the firing line, now the only ones who can see the real story and stop the unthinkable from happening.
Despite the fact hops are commercially grown from cuttings it is still possible for genetic variation to occur through selection of mutants for propagation (7):
for your time is so precious,
The lawyers claim that along with failing to determine whether a prisoner is unconscious before administering the lethal drugs, Virginia’s executioners have administered recalled drugs, misused a drug for general anesthesia and made mistakes in paperwork documenting the handling and administration of chemicals.
Hate the Police
I do not like "Grandma Got Run Over By A Reindeer.. "
Maria & Derek – 30
Lego: The Adventures of Clutch Powers 2010 Hollywood Movie Watch Online Full Movie
I do have one more fun thing to look forward to this week though, before I have surgery. The hubby and I are going to see Dierks Bentley in concert tomorrow night. I'm SO excited and ready to "get a little bit SIDEWAYS!" ;)
Linsanity demonstrated the enormous depth of the Knicks’ support, and Wednesday night’s blue parade was further evidence. But Yormark, citing the power of Brooklyn, said he isn’t concerned about snatching New York fans.
After being served a very bohemien cocktail of absinthe and cordial, I headed to the upper floor where Leila, a make-up artist with a passion for vintage and silent movies, was kind enough to give me a 20’s inspired makeover.
Anthony’s 3 commandments for reading aloud:
Tonight we went to Doc Chey's for some pad thai and spring rolls (mostly because i ordered some spring rolls in Charlotte that were just awful. The sushi was good but definitely not something that we'd choose to eat on a regular basis especially as there are so many fantastic places to eat around here). Our fortune said "Remember three months from this date. Good things are in store for you." I love very specific fortunes, especially since the one last year that come true to the date. So we'll see what happens by May 19th. Powerball, anyone?
Shards of glass went everywhere.
Collaborative consumption, social commerce and services addressing excess capacity are going to build very fast. Social gaming and entertainment will continue to ascend in a second wave of innovation across Facebook and increasingly through mobile devices.
This milestone brought so many emotions that I really wasn't prepared for. I know now after looking back over the past two year why this hit me like a ton of bricks. I'm so thankful and overwhelmed at the loving and nurturing enviroment that we chose and just looked at as "school"... it was so much more than that for her, for us.
Instant transformation. Nothing but smiles and songs and cute little jibberish like, "Don't hit Mommy! Mommy loves you!" and "I need candy" and "Hee-haw, hee-haw, hee-haw" the rest of the night.
Who needs a commercial rents database when you have Jack Fagan whose reporting of rents in Dundrum is summarised below:
Robert Power
So W and I talked about a paci intervention for several days. I told him that intervention meant that the pacis go in the trash and he gets a big surprise in return and on a designated evening I presented him a toddler racetrack with all sorts of bells and whistles. His paci fell to the floor as his jaw dropped open. He gathered up the pacis I had collected and stuffed them in a paper bag. We both walked over to his trashcan and tossed them in. Simple. As. That. Sure, he mentions his long lost pacis on occasion and has been staying up in bed with me 'til about 10:30 p.m. but he also says, “Pacis in trash, pacis bye-bye.” I think the fact that we talked about paci rehab prior to paci disposal helped so it wasn’t a surprise to him that it was going to happen. Now it’s just a boy and his blankie and I couldn’t be happier.
On the tongue - What all lagers should aspire to.
Matthew 6:33
instead of living in a perpetual state of discontent until we possess it?
with the Masters." This magazine coincides with
colors alone. Curse of the Golden Flower is directed by
If you have been a follower of my blog since day one, you may have already seen this, but I thought I would repost it, since many of you haven't seen it! I have also changed a few things as well. My first tutorials were a bit unorganized!
All these problems, it seems, would be solved by interbreeding, think about it, cats breed more rapidly than we do, given the same degree of dedication which has been applied to the colonisation of Europe, within a few decades we could rid ourselves of all the diverse breeds, with all their inconvenient breed related foibles, and create a single mono-breed, multi-purpose, cat. Perhaps we could call it a mogg.
1/2 lb scallops
C) Post it on Twitter.
Select the generic _sans font type (you will find it at the top of the fonts list).
I have lived in eastern US all my life, but have never been to Delaware, other than a drive through. And it is one of the least represented states in my postcard collection. Sometimes I think I should go for a day trip just to send myself postcards.
Of course, he also spoke about his cousin, Nobel Laureate Aung San Suu Kyi, who was then seventeen years into her period of house arrest, which began after the storming victory of her party, the National League for Democracy, in Burma’s 1990 elections. When asked about the Lady’s mindset, he said that he hoped she had enough books. If she had enough to read, he assured us, she would get by.
Mitt Romney, signaling that his entire campaign is going to consist of "I'm rubber, you're glue" arguments, is asserting that President Obama is the guy who's really waging a "war on women." Romney says that 92.3% of the jobs lost in this country since Obama took office have been held by women -- which may be technically true but (you probably know all this) fails to take into account the fact that recessions go in predictable patterns, and this one began, predictably, with much greater job losses by man. It also includes job losses from the very beginning of Obama's term, when his policies hadn't taken effect and, thus, couldn't possibly have had an impact.
Where was your favorite vacation?
As I write this, I realize perhaps the real moral of this story is to be wary of other people’s inspiration! They might coerce you into dragging heavy furniture across town, or employ you to construct their hopes and dreams. Hmm… on that note, thank you?
Things are looking pretty dismal in my fridge, chickadees.
-Non-members CAN take the pledge on behalf of RSO(s)
New Year, Wang Xiaoshuai, China. Documentary, 33 min.
Identification Plumage is light gray-brown, removal to white on waist, with cinnamon-buff undertail coverts. Rufous-brown cap, buffy eye band, buffy neck presented by pendant of dark-colored lines generally growing dark-colored area at platform of neck. Juvenile: does not have rufous title, has small strong wingbars, and is faintly streaked below.
I suppose it began when my friend Peggy announced she was going to a lovely Pacific island for a couple of weeks. She started posting these gorgeous pictures of palm trees and sand and water - warm, swimmable water. And there was blue sky and sunlight. We don't have much of any of those things here right now.
We were preparing to move house and at some point my cousin caught sight of my shoes as they were being packed up and couldn’t believe that these were shoes that I was still wearing to work. The question that made me laugh most was this: ‘Does your wife know that you are wearing such terrible shoes?’ I tried (unsuccessfully) to defend these shoes that I loved so much. In response I was given a proper tongue lashing, told that I should be ashamed of myself and ordered, under no circumstances, to wear those shoes to work, or indeed anywhere else again. Moreover, that I was admonished that since I was about to move to a new job I really ought to get a new pair of shoes.
As I reread the first part of John 13.....the little nugget of truth that I had not seen or felt as strongly as I do now caught me and went straight to my heart...."I tell you the truth, no servant is greater than his master, nor is a messenger greater than the one who sent him. Now that you know these things, you will be blessed if you do them." (John 13:16-17)
In a special morning ceremony in the capital, Naypyitaw, they read an oath they had previously disputed (and pledged) to safeguard the military-drafted constitution.
And when he told the dispatcher, “He looks black,” it was in response to a direct question, not an indication of motive.
“It is the system of nationalist individualism that has to go….We are living in the end of the sovereign states….In the great struggle to evoke a Westernized World Socialism, contemporary governments may vanish….Countless people…will hate the new world order….and will die protesting against it.” – H.G. Wells, in his book, “The New World Order”, 1940
Come on, it was the old Disney.
It does not mean a little bit of cheese now and again is okay, it does not mean it is alright to eat fish because they swim rather than walk, it does not mean it is fine to use honey because some people refuse to accept bees as animals, it does not mean home-collected free range eggs (which I once saw a fruitarian describe as “chicken fruit” and acceptable on a fruitarian diet).
This Sunday in Terre Haute, IN is the Nike Cross Nationals (NXN) Midwest Regional. Lukas is apparently going for the FootLocker, NXN double and will be there with the rest of his Sandburg team. Jack Driggs will bring his York team looking to continue the streak of being the only team to qualify for every NXN National meet since the inception. York will be tested not only by Lake Zurich and Belvidere North, but also the top ranked team this year in the Midwest, Columbus North of Indiana. Don't forget New Trier, Naperville Neuqua Valley and early season favorite Oak Park-River Forest.
Rochita: I had to think about a comment my brother made when he my work. How reading the story and then coming across a word or a phrase that is so obviously Filipino to the Filipino reader gave him that jolt of recognition. And I think this is something people forget. Readers from non-western places read SF too. It’s not something that’s confined to the West.
about how I wasn't going to be able to post my face tonight...
Here are some examples that I’ve heard from others:
discovered something rather intriguing: that sometimes the hulks were used
There's a darker evil in this book, what I loved was seeing how the Nephilim had grown has a team and more so as a family. I missed the other characters from the previous book but that added to the emotional side of the book because I don't think I was the only one.
We can trust it with our lives, yes, even our eternal lives.
will that help Republicans come to their senses!?!
· Adelphi St @ Myrtle Avenue
Oh these boys are getting so big. I feel like just yesterday I was in the hospital with this one. I can't believe that it has been almost 17 months. He thinks that he is MUCH older than he really is. I guess that's what happens when you have a big brother who you have to keep up with!
To create this card, I first re-sized and printed out Pretty Blossoms Printable flower onto watercolor paper through the rear tray my printer (used economy print to minimize ink smearing). Once dry, I colored it in with watercolor pencils and a DIY glimmer mist (perfect pearls + water mix). For the background panel, I applied distress inks, Wild Honey and Spiced Marmalade, onto white cardstock with a blending tool. Then stamped Flower Dot Pattern in Wild Honey and distressed edges with Walnut Stain and edge scraper tool. Next, I cut a strip of Walnut Cream Bazzill cardstock and stamped sentiment. Then, I added paper pierced borders and distressed it with Old Paper and Walnut Stain. Lastly, I adhered everything together to finish the card.
They are the CIA’s best, trained for any situation…except one. Twentieth Century Fox Home Entertainment plays the ultimate spy game as two best friends fight for the right of one woman’s hand in THIS MEANS WAR, coming to Blu-ray, DVD and Digital Download May 22. Starring Academy Award® winner Reese Witherspoon* (Walk the Line), Chris Pine (Star Trek) and Tom Hardy (The Dark Knight Rises), the laugh-out-loud comedy gets even better on Blu-ray with three alternate endings that answer the question – what if she chose the other guy?
the musical muscles of oblivion
At first, it felt a bit heavy on the hands, but once I spread it out it wasn't heavy at all -- it's actually lightweight.
1 cup (140 g) flour
Post, not to post, post, not to post ? This was the question haunting me before i composed this post. Last couple of weeks - last few months life has become too hectic. Me getting back to work after a break of two years and catching up on the latest changes, polishing and dusting my skills. The kids, their school, after school activities, anniversary celebration of their cultural activities, doing an extensive chauffer’s job in dropping and picking up for all these things and to top it all sickness, hospitalization, follow up Doctor visits and all the trauma and mental agony associated with it. I literally stopped blogging or commenting on any of the blogs.
Isn't she stylin'.
Man, it feels like forever since I have posted and ALOT has happened. This will be a long post, just fyi. When I last left off, my E2 was 70 on Monday. I went in for bloodwork on Wednesday and it was only 99. The nurse told me that I would be back in STL Friday and Saturday. She stated that it was good that they went up, but should have went up alot more. And if it didn't, my cycle would be cancelled. So they increased my Follistim back up and was told to relax. Ya Right!!! I was bawling all night. Between the small increase in E2 and the 6 hours round trip drive, I was feeling defeated and I wanted to crawl in a hole. Well, my DH saw how upset I was and told me he was taking Friday off work and we would leave Thur evening and go to STL and spend 2 nights!! I was so happy. I needed him more than I realized. I prayed a bunch, and cried a bunch, then tried to remain optimistic. I went in Friday morning for bloodwork then got the call Friday afternoon my level went up to 271!!! So we are back in the game!!! I bawled tears of joy on the phone with the nurse. Then she told me to come back in the morning for more bloodwork and an ultrasound. YAY, my first ultrasound since stimming.
khaṁ mano buddhir eva ca
In Act 1 v 8 the Bible says we shall receive power when the Holy Ghost is come upon us, in Act 3 v 1-8 after fire have poured upon Peter, he took a lame man by the man and because his hands has received power, he was able to transfer that power into the layman, and the layman now began to walk. I want you to stretch forth at this moment and say fire of God, fall on these hands so that from now on whatever I touch will begin to prosper.
5. I was looking forward to a $3300 tax return, the first in 5 years, which would have been a nice windfall, allowing me to get caught up and all and I was required to turn this over to the bankruptcy court trustee. Thanks to Ms. Trustee, I was allowed to keep the money I received from my partial rent payment I recieved.
We went upstream, paddling about twenty minutes. We went through lily pads. I looked for flowers among the flat green leaves. These flowers are a symbol of a human's best nature--of enlightenment--since they rise up dainty and beautiful out of the muck and mud.
It's actually part of the playset. The word "Jail" and the bar motif I'd like to hope were meant innocently at least in some sort of possibly inappropriate retro "High-Noon" western setting might work, but this piece of playground furniture was placed in a predominately Black and Latino housing project where as a local parent pointed out, many young people are already struggling to avoid the idea that "jail" is a natural part of their lives.
Every day for us something new
Janet Gaynor A Star is Born
According to Page Six, Boston magazine has been brutal to English, who is best known in New York circles for leaving his bride-to-be at the altar. He later took her to court for hitting him in the head with his own watch.
”Is it wrong to call an Indian Muslim mamak? No, because mamak means Uncle in Tamil and the community speaks the language,” he said.
There was great joy among the people now that the disgrace brought by the Gentiles was removed.
First up Haynes Acoustic Guitar Manual by Paul Balmer.
Autumn/Winter…..Bring it On!
Given that this player was over the age of thirty-five, (that's the minimum age requirement to play veteran's football), and on first name terms with the referee, it seemed inconceivable he would get himself sent off. Surely he knew what was coming next when he effed and jeffed it out with the man in black. But that's the game sometimes. It doesn't matter how old you are, or how many games you've played - not many of us can look at ourselves in the mirror and say we haven't succumbed to our base instincts at some time or another during play. Kristian Hewitt then scored the first of two second-half penalties. This after Dan Jackson and then Chris Pye had given us a two-nil lead at half-time.
You cannot fly to La Gomera from Europe, you have to fly to Tenerife first, then catch a ferry (adding hours to the journey) and thus it is very quiet here and not a lot to do if you aren't a keen walker. We heard that the family of Fred Olsen owns a high percentage of the island which would explain our cruise stop here!
_____After how many months of poking each other on facebook does it finally constitute a "relationship"? (funny relationship quote)
Lunch, then ice cream then drinks. Shameless! We weren’t the only travelers with this bright idea during the four day weekend. Needless to explain, traffic was atrocious. So were our appetites. Seated in our favorite little window cove, we scoped the specials menu and decided on the breaded clams, to start. Low and behold: the same crotchety waiter that served us during our last trip appeared in front of us with a not so bitter scowl. He was happy to take our order, this time, and quick to deny us any breaded clams. Short of calling them ‘crap’ he suggested the calamari, noting that The Fishwife was famous for it. We were hesitant, because, you know, it’s fried calamari. And then he served us these –
KAF treasury head Manimakudam Karuppiah told StarBiz the company was reviewing the case and would decide on its next course of action soon.
Exploring The World of Fine Wine
There is no doubt about it, we are heading towards a “Timegate” of pivotal importance for the Spiritual and Social evolution of our Planet. But, unlike most of the “doom and gloomers” out there, I am not expecting any great disasters, whether financial or literal. It is my belief that we can pass through these Timegates or Stargates with the least possible trauma, using the incoming waves of Higher Vibrational energy to manifest the New Earth Reality of the Fifth Dimension of Light.
12 Waltz For Pony
My Father-in-law, a tall and stout man, often likes to dispense pearls of curious wisdom. Pearls that draw you in. Make you listen and concentrate with your head down. Usually over a pint, cupping your ear against the background din of a Friday night. And when he's said what he's had to say, Pete will often just lean back with a satisfied grin, full of sage ambivalence, finish his bitter and go and get another round in. Leaving you standing there, bemused and perplexed, wondering, "Did he just say what I think he just said?"
Paper:
36. Careless Love
Emotions are mostly physical, not mental
The thoughts below aren't anything revolutionary but since winter is almost over (!!!!!), I figured I better let you read about my love for winter root vegetables before the asparagus kick-in full time.
Everyone can pshaw me. I have a complex about being treated as younger than I am. I will say, I know I look younger, which is fine in social situations and not an issue for me. Usually this bugs me most in a work situation. It is getting more fun to say I'm in my late thirties, but still, I get the "you're still young" statement at work more times than I can count. In my twenties, I thought, fair enough, but I do have ideas I would like to try. In my early thirties, sure, I've only been out of grad school for 5-10 years, I need to get some time under my belt. But now I'm starting to get a bit peeved. How many years should one expect to be in the work force to get respect for experience? So I keep thinking that maybe 40 is the magical number. That this is the time that people will say, "Ok, yeah, she's been around the block a few times." On the other hand, I have always worked with people older than me, so I guess they deserve to lord their years of experience over me. But I would like them to acknowledge that I have spent enough time in my business to warrant a nod of recognition that I do know what I am doing, on occasion.
Patricia :o)
Stats on At-Risk Properties:
“Twenty years after we built our house in a residential zone, we have now been informed that the road in front of it needs to be widened to accommodate the traffic. Any day now an entire swath could be cleared from our front garden, and the wall of our living room knocked down.
In a bowl cream the butter and sugar until pale and smooth.
5) Here we see the real intent of this capitalist lickspittle - blame the poor, the unemployed and the diabled for being poor, out of work and disabled and then remove their benefits. In other words whilst the bankster scum who Simpleton supports, and who he has been sticking his tongue up their arses for years, grow rich on the Bankster Welfare State Billions handouts from the government - he wants the poor to be denied benefits.
Six Point 7th Anniversary (Belgian Red IPA) - doesn't smell like much. Maybe a hint of funk, but I'm projecting. But here it is, a mix of Flanders Red funk and strong IPA bitter, muddled in the middle, immediately confusing, light bodied, corn chip and tobacco depth. But not a rewarding depth, so.. 2.9 Mugs
And there’s the parents, like me. All on our own journey, informed by our own experiences, what we read and what we observe around us. Some of us, more noisy than others. Most of us deeply disquieted by what we see, how we live, what we find. Some of us have a foot in one of the above camps, some have a foot in all camps, some have no affiliations at all. All of us (I'd speculate) have a deep desire to make the present and the future
Hey there and welcome back to the latest episode of whatever this train wreck happens to be! This week on Epic Beer Time (which is 100% a name steal from Epic Meal Time and nowhere close to being as good as that epic show)...
That may be the worst thing I've ever heard him say about a whiskey, certainly a major distillery whiskey. Anyway, I was more than a little intrigued, and since I particularly like to chase down the bad stuff, I had to try it. Is it as bad as Hansell suggests? Let's see.
Very little else is written about the African community at Wingfield – is the time right for the ancestors to be acknowledged and their contribution to the continuance of the African in the Caribbean honoured.
After a surge of anger, she realized that she got in Joe what she hadn't experienced in her own teenagers -- simply staggering maturity and untapped life skills. Except he was 21. So the Matron softened, understanding that he really was about 14 and learning how to manage his life in fundamental ways.
1/2 cup chopped walnuts (see note at end)
Not to compare myself to the brilliant Liz Kessler, but I couldn’t help but notice the Emily Windsnap books are in the range of 40,000 to 45,000.
It’s 5 degrees out, half past two in the morning, I’m hungry and I just finished a more than 2-hour “quick” run-through of your life. I would be lying if I say it was not interesting and the fact that it took me more than two hours wouldn’t be able to justify that.
Mouth feel is extremely thin. It's weird after smelling such heavy syrup that it was become a light and fluffy watery affair.
Leo de Rothschild was heavily involved in establishing or re-establishing Rothschild’s Latin American offices, especially Mexico, Brazil – where he was responsible for leading the financing for the Rio-Niteroi bridge – and Chile, a country he particularly loved, forming close links with the Matte family.
details will follow
When I burn you with my cold stare in the past
Our family—my husband Monte, daughter Sandy, son Nolan, and myself—was off to meet my nephew Todd up at the Greyhound Bus station.
The girls charge out in khaki vests with “PRESS” on the back. They get their assignments and run out, clutching notebook, pen and camera. Interview over, they rush back to the New Straits Times to carefully peck out their stories. Sap that I am, I find this ridiculously moving.
photobooth glamour shot sessions
You can also see some truly horrible reclads – two student towers with pitifully small windows and the similarly bleak grey-clad Thistle Hotel. The adverts emblazoned on the former use the word 'luxury'. Beyond that is the curious mix of early high-tech, Gothic and PFI of Teesside University, which advertises itself as 'University of the Year'; and the planned grid of terraces, which have a certain architectural variety, and several whole streets suffer the tinning-up that signifies the presence of the barbarous Housing Market Renewal Pathfinders.
I soon came to realize that self-imposed isolation was not the best course of action. I slowly began to rethink my personal goals and aspirations. I have begun exploring interests that I let fall to the wayside. I have been exploring new career possibilities. Though it has not produced any results as of yet; I now have the trust and faith in my capabilities to exceed in whatever I choose to do. I no longer take every rejection letter as a personal affront but rather a sign of the economic times that we live in.
Tim Roach, Regional Secretary,GMB.
Oh, and he’s a devout Christian, thanks to Ron Brown himself.
Imagine, they said, what would happen if Arthur had access to a formal financial product that provided a safeguard against emergencies, but the sensation of a game.
The winner of the Kindle is Pat Howe.
Animality: 2011 OPC Seminar & Exhibition, was made possible by the generous support of The University of Chicago Arts Council, the Department of Visual Arts, The Franke Institute for the Humanities, and the France Chicago Center.
This progression is making personal and internal the gifts of last month’s grand trine. At that point, three areas of your life locked together and firmed up, into a supportive patch of ground, tiny as it may be, that is beginning to flourish. Mystical, transcendent Neptune is watering that patch of ground now — perhaps with compassion (toward yourself, first of all), perhaps with artistic inspiration, perhaps with spiritual guidance and insight — and nurturing further growth. This is the platform on which you will stand when Uranus and Pluto go at it in June and September . It’s the promontory that will remain beneath your feet when other parts of your surroundings and life break away.
Still no completed pages, but some are only a couple cards away.
I had to put this sign on the fridge. After training I’ve been ”rewarding” myself with horrible, horrible things. My low point was a bowl of Rice Chex drizzled (make that drenched) with maple syrup. Did I mention it was in coconut milk? That’s enough sugar for a million hummingbirds.
Too irritated to answer her back, Sufi chose to stay tight-lipped.
When the moment comes where I write about other things besides teaching and learning, (side step – Walden University is where I am getting my Masters and the process has been incredibly amazing. I highly recommend this institution to teachers), I want to have some solid prior knowledge on the writing process that I can activate when ready – to my third graders, this is called our Schema.
Cannot believe it is May 1st already. I'm like...seriously....what the heck?? I can't keep up!! So much going on, so many good things/hard things/fun things all happening around me. So let me show you what I've been up to lately.
As, 2nd October is World card making day, Lil Bee's will be hosting a card swap. Details will be posted today. To participate send me an email or post a comment to this post.
Last night, instead of working on my new painting, I had to make some repairs to a canvas that has already been sold. I would rather have painted the whole piece again than repair it. . . I don't even know if my efforts will correct the problem. I painted the piece a couple of years ago and I'm glad it's sold, but I don't like the fact that it needs repairs and I can't identify what caused the problem.
It’s tempting to think of starting again in the next size because this colourway is just perfect for the dress I need a shrug for. Tempting… for all of two seconds! So for now, I’m say this is done but I’ll either give it away to DD or a neice.
Wyatt on the other hand went with a basic car design but his paint job required a different part of my attention.
Verse 12: Don’t let anyone look down on you because you are young, but set an example for the believers in speech, in life, in love, in faith and in purity.
wanted no binds on him, so she just called him Raven.
The four of us were talking about football in general, and a lot of it was spent slagging off Manchester United (Dawn being a big fan, me thinking they are the anti-Christ) and none of us were paying any attention to anyone sitting around us. Then the bloke with the refreshments trolley came by and asked if we wanted something...at which point the bloke sitting opposite me and Dawn, and who all this time had been engrossed in a broadsheet newspaper (The Guardian since you ask) turned to his companion and asked if she would like anything.
The sight at Hussian Sagar lake was a calming one . The winds were also keeping temperature chilly. The whole day’s trip came to a fitting end. It is a popular spot among tourist and I can certainly see why it is so.
The nastiest piece was the pleated outer bodice. The original used a very sheer, thin net with embroidery done on top to hold down the random tucks. I was using a much thicker net, unwilling to stay put, with no embroidery to hold it down. This meant I had to hand stitch the pleats into place. It's not pretty, unfortunately, but it was the only way I could get it to stay put. I spent at least two days tucking and untucking that bodice, both on me and the mannequin, to make it look random enough. I also had to use much less fabric than the original in some areas since it just wouldn't obey. Thankfully, the bottom edge (like many others) was left raw and hidden under the sash, so I just cut it off to the needed length!
¾ cup dry sherry
I want to appeal to the bar and restaurant owners at Norwegian airports: If you have to sell beers from the Ringnes group, use your imagination and find some more interesting beers. A selection from Brooklyn brewery on tap would be a great beginning.
the smile
This clinic has helped me focus on this issue. We're all in this together here, in a small, closed community in which we need to act and interact with each other. Many here have been temporarily derailed by personal circumstance, some are shedding the inheritance of a previous lifestyle, some are damaged and lonely souls who have lost their way in a world they barely understand, let alone be able to participate in in any meaningful way.
for our final session. We began by going over the twelve strategies we had taught
Now the full power of all that is happening in the world of tools and apps becomes available. Security is something that you design in rather than make security the only issue.
Passion for living.
K: His essay on the Texas death penalty case-
What literary character do you feel is most like you personality-wise (explain)?
But it was too late. This, as a father, was to be my “Indian Camp” moment- when little Nick Adams in Hemingway’s story sees the Indian husband slit his own throat because he could not stand the screams of his wife who is having a pretty tough time giving birth. His father explains to Nick that he does not hear the screams and by implication Nick shouldn’t either. But screams or no screams Nick just happens to be standing in the wrong or maybe just the right place. His view is perfect and Nick’s father can do nothing about it- except try to explain in his own uncertain way why people kill themselves.
Join us on Tuesday July 14 at The Coney, 8pm for our July homebrewing club meeting. We'll welcome a new member, Mike, who plans to share his first homebrewed beer. The Coney also now has Leffe Brune on tap, which is a nice Belgian dark ale. If you have some beer to share, please bring it.
Favorite music?
So the TABC is working within the law. The problem is, it's scaring the tourists. Convention and Visitors Bureaus around the state are complaining that this will reduce tourism, and rightly so. The owners of Dallas Night Club in Austin have sued the TABC charging them with intent to close them down. Not to mention that practically every blog on the Web has been mention this program.
And the end of the film is yet another example of Nic’s dubious charm with the ladies. Dude, just buy some goddamn flowers.
We know that He had a miraculous birth from a holy virgin woman.
It comes to $49.00.
2But those Jews who had not the faith, made the minds of the Gentiles bitter against the brothers.
So that, when I enter the next dimension
I have crossed the bridge several times on my way to the Google Company Store which unfortunately, is not open to the public. You have to know a Google Employee wiling to escort you into the store to shop there as a guest. But, on the bright side, you don't have to go to the store to purchase official Google gear.
Suddenly, I hear a voice from behind me, asking,
- Kaichou wa Maid-sama (love this anime so much! the love story is so sweet and at the same time, intense^^)
Toss with a simple vinaigrette.
Since the agreement was signed last month, angry Egyptian officials have echoed this sentiment. Ahmed Aboul Gheit, the Foreign Minister, described the Nile waters as a matter of national security and a “red line” not to be crossed. Some Egyptian newspapers even discussed tactics that would prove effective if war erupts.
Shari’a Courts
-You can tell her something what you love about girls, something that she’s totally not. Just make it clear that what she is, you’re not interested in, in general not her specifically.
This blog is ostensably about wine, and my passion is wine, but let's face it, I've been a bit neglectful in talking about it lately. So let's get back to basics: a blind Chardonnay tasting.
Power outages are still a daily occurrence in town, but for the last week or so they’ve been growing shorter — lasting anywhere from two to eight hours daily, instead of ten or eleven, and almost exclusively during the daytime.
Wednesday’s poem is not the first time Grass has come out with critical views of Israel. In a 2001 interview with SPIEGEL ONLINE, he offered his own solution for the Israeli-Palestinian conflict.
4 brotherhood
(name intentionally blurred for privacy)
The heroine of the story is a young woman, Lily Young, who is looking for her sister who’s caught up into the degradation of lumber camp life. While Lily searches for her missing sister, she fights against the evil that runs rampant around her, and she fights not to lose her heart to the lumber baron who turns a blind eye to the lawlessness of the lumber business.
The rest is from former bourbon barrels that have been through at least one full aging cycle with malt whiskey.
GAMALIEL TAPIHERU (21), however, chose to skip the parties and porn and ended up with his face on youtube. Together with his adorable sister AUDREY, they covered acoustic and acapella versions of top 40 songs such as Lady Gaga’s TELEPHONE and Jason Mraz’s LUCKY. Arranging and playing the instruments themselves, mostly in their bedroom wearing pajamas, they became one of the most harmonious singing couples since Kings of Convenience, and easily took the Indonesian music scene by storm.
So why would I want this bastard back?
3. My Foolish Heart
Once it is ready, fill the prepared jars, wipe the rims, seal and process.
GLA ELECIONS 2012: LONDON CALLING!
For those interested in the recipe bit, it doesn't end there. Accompanying the series is the book Two Greedy Italians' by Antonio Carluccio & Gennaro Contaldo, published by Quadrille (GBP 20, hardback) which contains over 80 fabulous recipes and even better photography. With a combination of both classic and traditional Italian recipes like the pizza and pasta and contemporary ones that take into consideration the changes in style and influences Italy has undergone in terms of food, the book is a must have for any one interested in Italian food.
Tony Soprano’s nephew Christopher Moltisanti sooner than the final season.
on the brink of collapse
He says back, "I was being sarcastic. I'm not somebody you should mess with."
To make the sauce, melt the butter in a sauce pan over medium-low heat. Whisk in the flour. Cook for 1 minute. Slowly whisk in the milk to prevent any lumps from forming. Add the garlic and simmer, whisking often, for 10 to 15 minutes, or until nicely thickened. Stir in the Parmesan and season with salt and pepper. Keep warm.
And a thousand other little things I miss with her gone
If you look to the origins of any development or movement which has improved the general well being of mankind, you will almost certainly find at its core a white European male, or a white male of European ancestry, the same would not apply to any other group you may wish to name.
If there was ever healing in your touch, ever love pour from your heart,
have painted you across the pages of my mind.
To God be the glory forever and ever! Amen!
A. My degree helped me in that it was very internship-oriented. My internships really taught me so much and made me a good copy editor, which is a skill that comes in handy in many ways.
I feel as if I'm finally lying down to rest after being tired for a very long time.
And, in the end, I guess I did name names after all.
Happy Friday everyone! Here's what I came up last night while trying to clean-up my messy craft table. :).
I worked this Sunday, the whole weekend in fact. Fortunately I could work from home and do some cooking at the same time, so that working on a sunny and hot Sunday wouldn't be so terrific. These alfajores-like biscuits are very simple and you can have loads of them from one dough because they are so small, and cute! But... beware! there is quite a bit of butter on them, what were you expecting? smooth dough = butter. Anyways after eating the first you won't care anymore. They are ideal for an evening with friends with some tea, coffee or mate in between, whatever you prefer!
LPW titled his piece, written in August 2011, “A numpty’s guide to appealing Tommy Sheridan’s conviction… “
If you lead or facilitate a Gurdjieff group and would like to recommend any colleagues to receive a copy of this newsletter and subsequent invitations, please email your request to us. If you wish to have your contact information updated, please email your request to us at:
All sitting in his favorite
Lynnette left the room and I fell back asleep. I didn’t dream. When Lynnette came back into the room it was to tell me that dinner was ready. She had made something like a mongolian beef stir-fry. It was good. But I really wanted lasagna or something like that. I don’t know why. I had the mental picture of the fork cutting through the several layers of pasta and meat sauce and it just seemed so damned appealing.
In the back yard I stretched my wings out and wriggled them a little. I stretched them out and flapped them a little. I jumped and flapped and stayed in the air for about a second. Then I really spread them and jumped and flapped hard and felt myself rise. I ran across the yard and jumped and flapped and rose a little higher.
hunched in pain,
1/4 cup rice vinegar (unseasoned)
On the report, Chikunga said: “The report today, if you look at it and really think about it, it’s somewhat a fatal report.”
Suited up for an award winning performance in a navy pin-stripe ensemble and her personal version of war paint, Addy marches to trial and decides to do whatever it takes to serve up some justice – even if it’s after the jury is long gone.
Being a parent is a huge task; monumental. And I didn’t sign up to do it solo. I was the most angry that he not only left me to do it ALL (from my perspective) but also was denying them the kind of life I had dreamed for them with two loving parents by their side in the same home.
He couldn't remember its name all he could remember was its strength. I searched the program but was unable to find it. After a visit to the BSF bar W1, I identified the 15% beer to be Godzilla brewed by Lowells Beer Works USA.
- Presents at all major conferences worldwide
This is going to be my last blog post for quite some time - perhaps even a year or more. Partly it's that I want to use the time I spend writing posts on other pursuits (mainly more reading) and partly it's because I've been appointed to the 2013 Newbery Committee (I'm almost afraid to announce that, in case I jinx it. But I've avoided reading any and all manuscripts - so all is good. All is blissful, in fact. Yay!!), so posting reviews of 2012 middle-grade books would need to be avoided anyway.
"We would rather lose a hundred corrupt cops and be left with ten morally-upright, committed and disciplined police officers."
These are two examples of them:
Final Destination series
Well, I blaspheme against the false god Reform. I defile its sacred books; The Wealth of Nations and Atlas Shrugged. I profane its doctrines as propagated in The Australian and other News Ltd organs.
So I’m asking if distance runners should get a pass? Should it take an inherently longer time for recovery from a 13:00 5000, or a 27:20 10000 than from a 9.80 100, 13.00 hurdle race, or 1:43 800 – just to toss out some random numbers and events? Let me know what you think. Should Cheruiyot competing a handful of times then winning a World Double (semi & final in the 5000, final only in the 10000) trump the grind it out seasons of a Pearson or Adams where there is not only more wear and tear, but more risk of loss?
Throughout the 1900s, cupcakes became popular kids' treats partly because of their ease in baking. In the early 1900s, Hostess introduced the snack cupcake, but it didn't become the Hostess Cupcake we know today until the 1950s.
Near Death Experience
2011, the five-year, 14%
Content until....
I am not like the companion canines, who have no rules, who do as they please and control their human masters. They are in charge. They are liberty takers. They need to be taught a lesson but their human masters do not do this. We expect humans to treat us like canines but you expect us to behave like humans, where the rules and boundaries constantly change.
Editors are the unsung heroes of the publishing world. While some of their names might be known inside the industry, the reader rarely has a clue. Yet the books they buy would never have been the same without them. Editors have suffered the most from the upheaval in publishing, and I fear their pain will continue as the Big Six continue to make missteps.
A granddaughter is a gift from above
Erica Van Acker, 62, New York, N.Y.
You can join a group of over 750 current and future industry leaders and network with your peers at the exclusive Cable Congress Gala Party hosted by cablecom, Lounge Bar, buffet lunches or coffee breaks.
That is a lousy way to live.
I’m still really bitter about finding and losing my soulmate within a moon’s cycle.
A devices name is the identifying mark inscribed onto an object. It is a symbol, whether it be one of exclusiveness, speed, or whatever else the name is intended to spur in the consumers mind. A name should be something instantly recognizable with the majority of the populous. All product names should have a few common characteristics; they should be easy to remember, they should be descriptive, and they should be relevant. Unfortunately, a plethora of horribly-named devices exist amidst the few gems, and icons, of the tech world.
I was looking through my photos trying to think of a different way to incorporate the word Trust for this challenge. When I came across this Halloween pic of the kids and saw the look on their faces my title popped into my head. Had a lot of fun mixing and matching different papers for the background and found some fab black open weave mesh in a Dollars and Sense store which I thought would add some grungy texture.
Put a fine-mesh sieve over the mixing bowl, measure in the flour, corn starch and baking powder and sift these into the butter/sugar/egg mixture. Now sieve in the Earl Grey/cardamom powder (basically to make sure you do not get a giant cardamom seed randomly into a cupcake)
Because Big Brother loves you and wants you to know
Having raised two wonderful boys & seeing them through university & out into the world I figure it's my time to shine & pursue my creative interests. Now my time is my own once again, I spend many hours searching out Treasures for my business, The Vintage Hatbox.
“Well, I dunno.” I had a mystery and weird powers to work on.
We have moved two more times for Cameron and we spend our lives searching for that special therapy or something that will help his brain make and hold connections so he can live a more independent life. If not he will be dependent on us for the rest of his life.
I would have thought that after Aaron had defeated the Dark Powers I thought that would be the end of them and the Nephilim could live in peace not having to keep looking over their shoulders in fear that they might be killed because the Powers had this dark and twisted notion that they were an abomination, did not deserve the right live.
Such a monstrous feat (remember one of us is only 5), seemed deserving of a monstrous treat.
Sally Hawkins, Happy-Go-Lucky
If you think about it we can probably attribute the high average unemployment rate as reflective of the rate of advancement in technology and social media. The population in general has lost sight of the importance of actual face to face human interaction; the important of visual gestures and physical touch to our physical and emotional well being. It’s really no wonder why the obesity rate and health care costs are sky high in America and why employers are opting to refrain from offering health care any longer. Employers are not willing to risk hiring older more qualified individuals in long term positions because their cost of care rises higher quicker over the term of their employment than does the cost of a younger persons. But that’s not the only reason older workers are being left out of the re-employment race, we are unfairly seen as no longer coach-able and therefore deemed less valuable without consideration of our experience and qualifications. The result is this we are actively participating in turning a vital corporate asset in human production into a liability ultimately viewing ourselves as expendable.
Procyonian ground troops of the elite Roan Brigade and Plejaran air cover led by Remiz stuck the base/warehouse at 9:00 pm CMT. What they found there…was horrifying.
I didn't get the natural birth I wanted. Not even close. I got a dubbed version of Rosemary's Baby with no subtitles. But I got Zed and he's a fat, happy healthy baby with blue eyes and a smile that slays me. And for that, I'd do it all over again a million trillion zillion times.
03-1921
It would be so easy to:-
can occur when the television, iPad, iPhone, laptop, is on.
And last, but not least, it is Police Week 2012. This is a great week to find a way to show your local Law Enforcement agencies (and their families) that you appreciate all of the sacrifices they make to keep your community safe. Although I don't often talk about it, I've been a law enforcement spouse (aka support staff) for 13+ years. Matt's profession impacts every area of our lives and he is on-call 365/24/7. We've had to learn to be flexible and how to celebrate holidays in creative ways due to call-outs and strange work hours. I've also learned to manage that nagging worry that I get each time Matt leaves the house in his bullet-proof vest and cherish every moment we do get together as a family. It is sometimes easy to feel that what Matt does and that the sacrifices we make as his family go unappreciated - so make sure that you reach out to Law Enforcement and their families in your community to let them know that you care about them.
Saucy seaside postcards.
Protecting the Phoenix Islands means restricting commercial fishing in the area, resulting in a loss of revenue that the Kiribati government would normally receive from issuing foreign commercial fishing licenses. NEAq and CI are helping Kiribati design an endowment system that will cover the core recurring management costs of PIPA and compensate the government for the foregone commercial fishing license revenues. The plan allows for subsistence fishing by resident communities and other sustainable economic development in designated zones of the protected area.
“I am honored to be joining the Celtics,” Shaq said in a statement issued by the club. “I have played against Paul, Ray, Kevin, Rajon, and Jermaine for many years and it will be great to be able to call them my teammates. I cannot wait to get to Boston to get started in pursuit of another championship.”
Stamps - Orchids (Flourishes), Happy Birthday (CTMH)
Again, don’t get me wrong. I never need a reminder of my Lord. He is with me always, but when those hot, humid months roll around, the feeling of Christmas, good tidings, good cheer, the giving spirit that we feel in December, somehow gets lost by June.
'The palm for Christmas-stocking books seems to have passed recently to popular science, with best selling titles every year such as Why Don’t Penguins’ Feet Freeze? This year there has been a gallant attempt at a historical fight back. Scotland: 1,000 Things You Need to Know(Atlantic Books, £12.99) asks (and answers) such post-turkey questions as ‘How many kings of Scotland died in their beds?’, ‘Who on earth decided that the Declaration of Arbroath was the cornerstone of modern democracy?’ or ‘Why is iron brew spelled Irn-Bru?’ Mark Mazower,History Today; The Best of History in 2008, December 2008
For instance, Wiesel claims:
In another unrelated event, two robbers attempted to rob a house in Jim Verster street at roughly the same time as the Golf crashed into the tree.
The real meat of this award is that I get to share some of my favorite "Blogs With Substance" with you. Here is a list of blogs I eagerly read when they are in my Google Reader.....in no particular order of course.
Prayer: Lord, it is my hope that you will supply me with the grace necessary to follow through with the call that brings me great joy in my heart and rest in the knowledge that you will show me the way to follow your will in this and every decision I make in my life. I ask this, as always, in the name of the Father, and of the Son, and of the holy Spirit. Amen.
02. Flagranza (01:05)
We both agreed that it is something we should do more often.
Vintage Rose
My initial plan was to return Spoil to the paid list on Amazon while it was still in the Top 100 on the free list. When that milestone passed, I hoped it would still be in the Top 200, then the Top 300. Now I'm holding my breath for 2012. Free books usually start to lose their appeal and their rankings after 7-10 days. Spoil has enjoyed a decent overall rank for an extended period of time (which MAY be why Apple is reluctant to unfree it just yet), but a major fall in the rankings is inevitable. I'd really, really like to be shunted over to the paid store before that happens and the chance for visibility is lost.
Several years ago, after a frustrating series of flats, I went in search of a more puncture resistant tire. A Kevlar slick was recommended to me. I tried it, though I was skeptical of how much traction a tire with no tread would provide.
Psalm 119:160
The 6 Strangest Fashion Trends in History by Colin Falconer: This post is from last week, but I just saw it so it is getting included now. Colin found some hilarious fashion trends from the past, including a codpiece. Yep, you read that correctly.
9. Will you share an excerpt with us?
and today i don't really know why i went to the op shop because i hadn't really intended to but i did..
A toxic beauty or a plastic flower
He crowns you with compassion
In Shakespeare's time, mattresses were secured on bed frames by ropes.
“You are with a better tune
Fill donut pan circles about 2/3 of the way full with batter.
This book appears to be a culmination and summation of all of this work. This is good news for two reasons: One, the work is very technical and dense and this is a popular press book that puts it all into plain language. Two, it is based on work that is very technical and extraordinarily thorough, especially the empirical work. So this is not a book of idle suppositions and possible links but a book based on theories that have been rigorously tested empirically and subjected to the intense scrutiny of peer-review.
The Left— Liberals, Progressives, Democrats— doesn’t like to be disagreed with. They want to shut down opposing voices. They have long wanted to eliminate freedom of speech. Witness the recent campaign to get Rush Limbaugh off the air because he said something rude about Sandra Fluke, while they completely accept any and all rude things said about Sarah Palin. Witness the outcry against Fox News particularly, but any other Right-leaning publication. Congressional Democrats want the power to shut down opposing voices.
PMcC – In recent years there have been various cases where the reputation of Scots Law, which for many years was justifiably high, has been damaged. I don’t think that the Sheridan case is yet one of them, although I can see how it might become so. I don’t think anyone involved in the legal system should be complacent about the problems it has, and most are not.
Alex Jones: Oregon Senator Reveals Secret Government Surveillance Grid ! Cynthia McKinney: Obama’s So Called Humanitarian Aid to Libya is A Disaster! The Absurd US Stance on Israel’s Nukes! The Daily Bell: US & UK – Next Phase of World Domination? Jeremy Warner: It’s Ever More Obvious, Greece Must Leave The Euro! Ian Gordon: World Headed For A ‘Gold Standard System’ By 2014 ! Keiser Report: Gold Stands Rock Hard !
After the initial haul of videos featuring either forced camaraderie between the stars and their crypto-protegee rookies, or just those seven same newbies off doing their own (noisy, grating) thing by themselves, the project seemed to settle in and we got two glorious on-the-sly micro-mini-movies of T-ara glamourously disporting themselves in Milan and Venice for the benefit of still photography. But just as the whole project started to feel like aesthetic bliss instead of the grueling exercise in futility it first promised to be, it all came to a halt. Adding injury to injury, the Venice video got inexplicably pulled from its regular home on youtube (thankfully it endures over at dailymotion).
Let us now consider the Personal Daemon of Aristotle and others… Most men, and some most unlikely, keep him under an alias which varies with their literary or scientific attainments. Mine came to me early when I sat bewildered among other notions, and said; ‘Take this and no other.’ I obeyed, and was rewarded....
And, as we envision the moment, we stand in awe.
Will the French fashionistas leap into spring? I think so... but I would bet that it will be a discreet nod to this season's collections not an all out scramble to replicate the look... Except that... French girls have been wearing the wedges, carrying the totes, sporting the pendants, loving leather and swinging their coats for many seasons... Perhaps flower power will make all the difference and sprout up via their scarves... xv
feat. Hasan Salaam & Rugged N Raw
Please feel free to pass this e-mail along. I welcome hearing from any and everyone who is willing to share what they've learned by pursuing running as an older person. Why do they do it? How did they start running? Do they race competitively? What are the challenges? What's
It was a such great day. I'm so fortunate to be surrounded by some of the coolest kids imaginable, and hubby gave flowers and a shopping spree to buy some new running gear, so I have that to look forward to, too. I hope you, also, were able to make the day memorable one way or another!
Art France
I sometimes let my mind leak to thoughts of "the end ." I hope it comes on a spring day as I listen to birds.
Now on to the tutorial!
Remote play
eating fresh summer berries
We have different values, we and London. No clearer example can be found than in our belief that education is everyone's right. 'Til the rocks melt wi the sun' said our first minister on the right to a free university education.
-thankful
“The pride of your heart has deceived you, you who live in the clefts of the rocks and make your home on the heights, you who say to yourself, ‘Who can bring me down to the ground?’ ‘Though you soar like the eagle and make your nest among the stars, from there I will bring you down,’ declares the LORD” (Obadiah 1:3,4). “Pride goes before destruction, and a haughty spirit before stumbling” (Proverbs 16:18). “Humble yourselves before the Lord, and He will lift you up” (James 4:10).
The best part about making a plan, whether for eating or exercise, is that you get the opportunity to tweak it every week, as you discover what works and doesn’t work for you. If you missed a workout or ate too much — don’t quit — every day is a do-over!
As you can probably tell, Mati is no ordinary cat. He is of an ancient bloodline that dates back to a legendary Egyptian queen who gave birth to two magical kittens. The spotted Sa and the red-coated Abyssinian Tygrine have been at each other’s throats ever since, and Mati is the last of his kind. Sent across the sea to England by his mother as a young catling for his own safety, he finds a home of sorts at Cressida Lock market with a gang of feral cats and wise old Sparrow. He also makes a friend of nervous stray Jess, who used to live with a human (called a ‘hind’) but cannot find her way home.
The message conveyed to them is that we are weak and scared and this makes them despise us for not standing up for ourselves. When immigrants arrive they are welcomed by hordes of do-gooders - they can tell any lie and it is accepted.
Copy Paper 2 from the kit, Paste as a new layer, Selections, Invert, Delete, Select None
2. In food (finest of wheat)
And the last smile is unwilled
Juliette et Justine has been releasing a lot of pieces similar to this lately, it seems as if every time they release some new pieces, at least one of them is a classical art print. Juliette et Justine has much simpler designs than most brands, but the rarity/expense of their pieces, while being incredibly obnoxious to most people, at least keeps the community from being completely up to their eyeballs, and completely bored with this new trend.
I hope everyone continues to keep their sustainability promises…
-3 tablespoons butter
As you'd expect from a book comprising three other books, Three Great Novels is a weighty tome, clocking in at over 600 pages. And in fact copies of this hardback edition of the omnibus aren't that common; paperbacks are plentiful online, but hardcovers number in the single figures, and go for at least thirty or forty quid. I struck lucky on this copy though: it's a little grubby, but then it cost me less than a fiver, so I can't complain. The hardcover's scarcity may be down to it being the first time that these novels made it into hardback in the UK (large print editions aside); unlike the US, where all three were initially issued in hardback by St Martins, in the UK Serpent's Tail published the third book in the trilogy, Down by the River... in paperback in 1996, then followed it with A Firing Offense in 1997 and Nick's Trip in '98, also both in paperback. Not sure why they decided to publish the third novel first, but maybe it was just to stay abreast of the 1995 US publication of the book. In any case, effectively, Three Great Novels represents the UK hardback debut of all three books.
Those who installed illegally acquired software in their PC have many reasons as you can imagine. Some say buying pirated software is the best alternative to very expensive proprietary software. Another argue that if it’s not used commercially, there is nothing wrong about it. Some point out that without that pirated software, they can not run their PC because license is too expensive for an ordinary user.
Here’s an excerpt from one:
The Allure Of Beach Metal Detecting
As not to bore you with all the things I learned along the trial and error trail, here was the solution.
Dried red chillies - 2(increase or decrease according to personal taste)
Judge # 1 -- Black bean chili with almost no spice. Disappointing.
I hope that someday I’ll get over this. Probably I’ll have some breakthrough in therapy that will enable me to 1) quit smoking, 2) cut down on the drinking, 3) lose weight, 4) begin to exercise regularly, and 5) eat all the foods I can’t eat right now. Won’t that be a fucking miracle?
As an activity to introduce the difference between consumers, ask the students to share what they had for dinner the day before, the teacher should write in the blackboard what they offer. Then, make them classify the food into groups; the idea is to get a group of vegetables, a group of animals or meat and a combo. Tell the students there is a scientific word for these 3 groups: Herbivore, carnivore and omnivore. Explain that this classification is the same that we use to to to categorize the different types of consumers. Explain the 3 concepts: herbivore: an animal whose diet consists on plants, carnivore: an animal whose diet consists of other animals, and omnivore: an animal whose diet consists of both animals and plants.
Petal Pizzazz w some stains $12.00
* Hani Hanjour, 9/11 hijacker and Saudi national who flew the jumbo jet into the Pentagon.
I rather liked the look of this fun cupcake pincushion...
We opened an old local wine.
It was a very simple ceremony – the bride and groom faced each other and the guests formed a semi-circle round them. The legalities of the ceremony were carried out first, as were the exchanging of the rings and their vows to each other.
But anyway - the good part about seeing Mr Consultant was that I got another scan. Very unexpected! I didn't even know our little local one had the facilities. Mr Consultant agreed with the scanner lady from before - he said he wasn't 100% but thought he could definitely see 'something'... and of course as soon as he said it, little rascal in my tum crossed his/her legs. Suffice to say we are now thinking of more boy names than girls but are still not going to say it for definite ;)
I don’t know why I delude myself into thinking I have places to go that would warrant wearing these types of shoes. They are making my closet look super So-Ho in the meantime.
Only to be known through the little things
Where you can lose your shirt and pants.
Hopes from fears”
The conservatives do find that a lay men can not bring a sermon because according to the Roman Catholic Church such a task is only for the ordained, priest, bishop, cardinal or Pope. “Lay may not may preach. Point. A sermon is not ‘the word Gods’, but an explanation by the H. Gospel” the Catholic Action says and therefore the writers of the manifest asking to have laymen also to be able to preach is one more reason they are heretics.
39. The diner in the movie The Sting is the same diner interior used in Back to the Future.
MaryJane's Farmgirls Sisterhood members have the “can-do” attitude I find appealing. They stress you needn’t live on a farm to qualify. In fact, there’s a posse of contributors including an urban and a suburban writer. I think I’ll join MaryJane’s Farm and make new friends!
A kingly crown to gain;
*Note- When I am actually doing these practical jokes, in the thick of it so to speak, you will normally find me giggling away to myself like a schoolgirl. When the recipient of the joke finds out, and the cries of “Who the bloody hell has done this?” rings round the office, you will then find me at the back of the rapidly forming crowd with my arms crossed, shaking my head in disgust at how some people can be so childish. Now you may call this the coward’s way out, I just call it cunning.*
Faced with a truth she never imagined and fighting off the old cravings, she treasures the only bit of normalcy in her life. Her budding relationship with a local boy, Alex Cameron. When Alex appears in renaissance England, Hope realizes she's been played. Alex is a member of the criminal Timeslippers. He’s ordered to steal the powerful Libri Atlantius and kill its owner, the young alchemist John Dee. He is also charged with killing anyone who gets in his way. With the book of Atlantis in the Timeslippers possession, they can shape history any way they wish. Now, Hope has to stop the Timeslippers from getting their hands on the book, save Dee, and bring her mother back home. No biggee for a recovering addict.
Ever wonder why Jesus addressed Mary his mother as Woman and not Mother?
"The design team at Converse has picked your work from 100s of artists to potentially be a part of our Converse (RED) program. (RED) is simply and magnificiently a program established by BONO of U2 to help reduce the effects of AIDS, malaria and tuberculosis within Africa." http://www.joinred.com/
“…While you sit around thinking about what you can’t change and worrying about all the wrong things…Time Flies By…it moves so fast, you better make it count because you CAN’T GET IT BACK!”
And I thought: that’s coming dangerously close to me sounding like I know what I’m talking about with this gardening lark.
a. Decades of water pollution, poisoning:
In a journal entry dated June 25 1945 he says:
David Starkey – Ready
SOLUTION: focus on measuring the moments
But did I give up, dear readers? I did not! Instead, I grabbed an empty Coke Zero box, put a blob of peanut butter in the bottom, and plonked it down in the recess. And waited. After a few minutes the little mousey came out, had a sniff about, then went back behind the cupboards again. Still I waited. Out it came, and progressed a short way into the box, before shooting back again. Still I waited. Finally, the furry little bugger was overcome by greed, and scuttled right into the box, burying its mousey nose in the peanut butter. And then I pounced, tipping the box up, and trapping my rodent nemesis.
Long as the discourse is, let me now present the further articulations of the subject by the noblesse chela of the mahatmas, HPBlavatsky, in Volume I of Secret Doctrine, to wit:
At one point in the movie Conan says that when he dies, he will go in front of Crom, God of the Earth, who will ask of him the "Riddle of Steel." If he doesn't know the answer, Crom will mock him and cast him away from Valhalla. No one wants that, so in addition to seeking revenge against Thulsa Doom, Conan works to unravel the Riddle of Steel. So. Fucking. Metal.
“Therefore, whoever thinks he is standing secure should take care not to fall. No trial has come to you but what is human. God is faithful and will not let you be tried beyond your strength; but with the trial he will also provide a way out, so that you may be able to bear it.” (1 Corinthians 10:12-13, emphasis added)
I printed up dozens of recipes from the Internet and my favorite blogs. I looked them over and puzzled as to their differences. I pulled out cookbooks and opened them to the rugelach recipes. There, they were in a pile but which one did I use? Indecisive - absolutely.
It’s just paper
One aspect of this gaming experience was tantalizingly described in the TechCrunch article mentioned above, namely, the role of trade marks and brands as a part of the effort to monetize virtual goods. Permit me to quote Chahal on this point as follows:
"Brands are already a prominent part of the social Web. Facebook users post branded gifts on each other’s walls—paid for with real money—and become fans of those brands’ pages. And why wouldn’t they? The essence of social networking is the expression and projection of one’s identity, and brand affinity is a central theme of nearly every modern consumer’s persona. Why buy a Gucci dress when you can get the same look from DKNY or even J Crew? Because it helps you express something different, and feel better doing it. Virtual goods are no different, except they are don’t cost as much. Already, branded virtual goods are clicked ten times more often than non-branded equivalents. In this light, it isn’t hard to visualize the virtual marketplace of the near future. (Emphasis added).
When ensuring those who cannot speak are spoken for’s your mission
The dinner is tapa style and the dishes are meant to be shared. First we had the Deep fried chickpeas. I've never had chickpeas this way, but I loved it. It's a light appetizer to start with. Then, there came the gnudi, which is essentially a naked ravioli, and the deep fried pork belly (I think). Both were tasty.
If you want to make things happen, you have to work. If they don't happen when you work, then work more. Sleeping is for the dead.
There is something else in common with these father songs and some other songs about fathers, (i.e., Paul Simon's Father and Daughter and John Mayer's Daughters). It is that they all tend to be full of tention. Bono notes "we fight, all the time." Dan Fogelberg's dad has a "thundering velvet hand." John Mayer sees a poor father resulting in the next generation having to "clean up the mess he made." Gabriel's tention of learning to trust his father comes through fear of water and learning to swim.
There is an inherent and deliberate spin here in terminology by the publishing industry.
Guaranteed to Kick Bob's Ass:
I roasted a chicken the other night, along with the standard root vegetables (carrots, potatoes, turnips, onions, celery, garlic cloves, etc). It was wonderful (but everyone knows how to do this, I think, so I won't share how I did it, I'm here to talk about the leftovers). See, the chicken (due to being sustainably raised, and my not wanting to spend a ton of money on meat) was tiny, and after the one dinner for the two of us, there wasn't really a full meal for two left for the next day. (Also, Axel F doesn't love eating leftovers, particularly). So to transform what was left into a new and different (and more generous) meal, I took all the meat I could off the bones of what remained of the chicken (half a breast and a thigh), chopped up all the roasted vegetables nice and small (along with some cooked broccoli I had leftover from another meal, and some thawed frozen peas) and threw together a casserole. It turned into enough food to feed an army (or well, 8 people) generously. This could be done meaty or vegetarian, with any kind of leftover cooked meat or vegetables that you have on hand (or if you started with drained canned tuna and frozen peas, it's the classic tuna noodle casserole).
Who is in Funi and when did the band form?
My colleague Declan McCullagh noted a potential complication in hiring a lawyer: SLAPP laws. Although they vary from state to state, they all basically aim to prevent unsubstantiated legal threats. If you threaten someone, that person can turn around and sue you for attorneys fees and damages.
I had the urge to leave, to go outside and hack out the muffin, so I did. I ran out the door and hacked myself silly, a cat with a hairball. Not pretty.
On the first of May Germany celebrates International Workers’ Day, funnily enough by staying home and not working at all. But the much nicer tradition the busy German worker bees observe is “Der Tanz in den Mai” (The Dance into May).
Then, Monday, it struck.
And she told a conference in Colchester, Essex, that since becoming a Muslim she was a "better worker" and a "better mother" to her two daughters.
To be fair, I can imagine a French person (okay, Ben) describing American weddings as lovely but somewhat stuffy affairs where everything is timed to the minute and over before you've even had time to digest the appetizer. Since we are getting married in France, he has nothing to worry about, it will definitely be a super French and very long wedding. But despite all my time fretting about fitting in, this is the one thing I really want to leave my American mark on, even if it's only visually. I want people to say, "Wow! I've never seen anything like this before!" Which really, I think every couple wants for their wedding, so maybe I'm putting extra stress on myself for nothing!
My husband actually uttered the words “Oh my God” after his first bite. He then said “I hope this is one of those times you can remember what you did so you can make it again”. Don’t worry honey, this one is saved in the hard drive!
Rating: ***1/2
Well the game finally started about half an hour late and from what I’ve seen a bit of a slow one so far. Entertaining Aydn has kept me busy for the most part though.
Let me throw in one other wrinkle in this discussion of medals in Majors. Those teams, those that preceded them, and several up to the early 90’s, were dominated by AMATEUR athletes – athletes that had to split their training with holding down “regular” jobs while they tried to fulfill their athletic dreams – athletes that worked as bank tellers, security guards, teachers and other “day jobs” to pay the bills. Compared to today’s athletes for whom track and field IS their job – and instead of going to the office are able to go to the track/weight room and deal with coaches, physios and masseurs in their pursuit of World and Olympic medals. It seems to me that these “Professionals” have a distinct advantage over their predecessors in that they are able to focus completely on the sport. So I’m not sure why we are trying to compare the successes of the past with today’s athletes – unless it’s to say look what was accomplished with LESS.
For those interested in self-publishing: Shortbread stories are offering a fantastic prize of a self-publishing package worth £3000. Submit a novel, novella or a short story collection before June 17th. Details here.
As I said in yesterday's post, this kitchen was not designed for large appliances; the footprint is small and most of it is occupied by appliances that are not the right scale for the space. At 33 inches wide and 34 inches deep, this fridge occupies a lot of precious kitchen real estate, and the interior space is so much more than I need. I shop daily, so my refrigerator is never full; space for perishables--cheese, butter, milk, eggs--is what I need.
...some downtown architecture.
That’s it for today! If you live in NC, GOTR Triangle has a 5K this weekend that you should check out. More than 3,000 runners show up and 500 girls in the GOTR organization will run it together. It’s a short race, but it’s for a great cause. I’ll recap the race and braid next week!
A shadow of doubt seemed to pass over John's face. “But how much of this is real?” he said.
Hope you like my card!
I cannot speak for all my colleagues but it has become clear to me that I must abandon nearly everything I used to do in the classroom and become “born again” as a teacher. At least for the foreseeable future, since the list of individuals that are waiting to pounce upon us at our first wrong step is long and filled with powerful figures.
I order a platter and drink a pint of our LA-31 beer. The crawfish are awesome (Myran offers a seasoning mix for you to make any last minute adjustments to your crawfish – I don’t think anyone has ever needed to) and the beer compliments the spicy crustaceans. It is easy to waste away an afternoon at Myron’s, eating perfectly seasoned crawfish, drinking craft beer and looking at the Teche lazily roll through the restaurant’s back windows – but if I don’t get back to work I’ll have a spouse and two brothers pretty upset with me. I ride back to our brewery, just on the other side of the Bayou from Myran’s. On the ride back home I’m already planning the second leg of my LA-31 odyssey – I think I can squeeze in a road trip soon from Arnaudville to Lake Martin.
thrilled to tell you that she's graciously
Fast forward one week. A lot has been going on to reconfigure our life as a family of five, back together all on one level of home. It took a lot of work to go from 2400 square feet to 1200 in the matter of a day. How was it possible? It was all about picking our most favorite things, and condensing the contents of both the upstairs and downstairs. It was about imagining our daily routine, and planning to lay things out accordingly. It was about knowing that since insurance wasn't covering our loss, that it is going to be quite some time to recover and regain our space.
Your regular price is expensive, ‘t way too high as an example.
The Devil's Rain poster is HUGE, the same size as the Suspiria one I'll show ya in a minute. The picture is beautiful, but the text makes no sense. "Heaven help us all when THE DEVIL'S RAIN!" When the Devil's Rain does... what? Falls? Then I'd understand it. That text is like a little papercut on my mind, that is. Anyway, there it is, the movie that made John Travolta get wet! Then he went from devil-worship to something far more frightening and detrimental - Scientology. Heaven help us all when XENU RAINS! Yeeaarrggh. Even William Shatner can't save us from that. Anyway, next to it, Fulci's gutmuncher, The Gates of Hell, known to the DVD generation as City of the Living Dead. Below it is a little video-two-sheet for Terror, aka Last House On The Beach, that was sent to me by the same old video bootlegger friend of mine. Last time I heard from him, he was in some trouble with the Mafia for selling dupes of some of their porn. Oi. I bought Scooter Trash from him, so I guess the Sons of Anarchy'd be after me. In the corner you can see part of my Tales From The Crypt poster, hiding behind some ancient stereo equipment and a stack of VHS. Here's a better look at that...
I log into Blogger today and find that there is this new "marriage" and I was asked if I wanted to upgrade now. Like Facebook forcing the new tineline feature on it's users I was told that Blogger was going to upgrade to the new look in April whether I opted in or not. So I made the change. I'm OK with the new interface. I like seeing the page counter on my list of posts. I can be competitive at times so things like page views fuel that competitive fire at times.
There are also rules that apply to embellishments, which includes ribbons, ties, appliques. Don't despair you can still make sleepwear, you just need to comply with the standard.
Okay, I'm bragging now so please excuse me.
One of my absolute pet peeves would have to be a dirty and untidy fridge. It is certainly a job that I do try to tend to on a very regular basis, be it wiping the shelves or discarding food leftovers that have been in their too long. But I've never come up with a good solution for lining the containers/shelves on the fridge door. After being taken in and out and placed onto a not always spotless bench during breakfast etc the bottom of the bottles/jars/containers end up grubby and sticky and leave residual gunk in the shelf beneath them in the fridge - yuk! I've tried lining them with paper towel and even brown paper but the OCD in me, hates this because they don't adhere to the shelf properly and taping them would be a sticky mess, and then I end up having to replace it more often than not.
I am so stressed out and I have so much in my
It didn't really work ... or we were impatient ... or it didn't work ... ya, that's it, it didn't work!
All ideas and opinions are Mike's own and may or may not reflect the opinions of this website. Any rebroadcast, retransmission, or account of this post, without the express e-mailed consent of The Hopeful Chase, is prohibited...or at least frowned upon.
This was my day off for this week. I got this yummy Pocky from the postman.
and in the thick air of summer,
Since a good article is never good if it is not completed with some good photography, I would like to introduce the photographic project “Shard 2012″ started by the partnership between London based architectural CG studio Hayes Davidson and London photographer Nick Wood. The “Shard 2012″ is an online exhibition of ‘future photography’ of the Shard exploring some of the vantage points from where the Shard might be photographed in 2012 once it is completed. Those photographs indeed show the juxtaposition of the Shard with the historic and the iconic London.
7 months ago I had a fractured foot and could not run a kilometer without feeling like my heart was going to give up and I had to make use of my “in case of emergency” contacts – but look at me now, look at me now, look at me now I’m running marathons.
The answer is simple...I gave in to what is currently popular culture and that is:
Third day riding through the desert and really I have to be honest we were starting to get bored. The variety of two days before had disappeared and this morning was just more and more flat scrub hotness.
Track Listing for Reign In Blood:
Needles: US 4 circ's
Seldom in our lives have we had the opportunity to watch, first hand, as a major Western power comes crumbling down on itself in such a spectacular fashion as we see with the final collapse of the now empire less Britain. Only the eventual collapse of the USA will make for a greater show than what is about to transpire on these shores.
This is how to enter: Visit Yiota's XStitch website and browse through all the patterns and kits she has designed. Then come back here and leave a comment telling me which of her designs you would love to stitch. I will draw the winner's name on Sunday, May 13, which is Mother's Day here in the USA! Good luck!
Sebastian VETTEL: I think it is hard to say how much we lost but surely we lost the lead. I think we had quite a bit of a cushion at that stage so it didn’t help. I came out behind Fernando and Lewis and struggled to get past really. I had some places where I was quite close to him but it didn’t quite work so we went in for the stop and I had a longer stint at the end. But all in all we had a very good race. It was very difficult in these conditions. I had a brilliant start and was able to pull away quite good at the beginning of the race on intermediate tyres. Then I think we waited a little bit and we weren’t that aggressive which cost us a bit of our lead plus then the pit-stop so little mistakes here and there. But you cannot get it right all the time and you have to accept Ferrari beat us fair and square today. It was not only in this race, I think there has been a certain trend over the last couple of races. They have been very strong on race day on Sunday and generally improving their car so it shows us we need to keep on working very hard and keep pushing very hard so soon it is the other way around again.
I drove Rob to work, all the time remembering a few tiny details – where my orange collar necklace had got too thin at the join point, and the sharp points on my donut bracelet.
There are certain inside insults and hurtful things that in one word, can bring back a flood of memories and feelings.
Beer 3 was just a quick sample, the Intensified Coffee Stout. Had this beer been lower in alcohol (8.5%) I probably would have had a few, but since we had a LONG day of bachelor party drinking to do, I only gave it a taste. WOW!!!! I could smell the coffee aroma before I even stuck my nose in it! The first sip was amazing. Big coffee flavor, with a great rich malty backbone. The maltiness and coffee flavor really mask the alcohol in this, which is part of the reason I shied away from it.
I wanted to write an m/m love story but I didn’t want it to be full of angst—I often joke that the book is Brokeback Mountain without the angst and poverty. Seriously, it was important that the characters in What Binds Us be open and accept themselves from the beginning and learn to surround themselves with those who support them. I wanted to tell a happy story but because the characters are so young, I thought it was important to capture the insecurity, the hesitation, the self doubt (he couldn’t possibly love me) that comes with youth, and show them growing up to overcome the obstacles they placed in the way of their own happiness. And finally I knew from the beginning I wanted to touch on the AIDS crisis but I didn’t want it to be the main focus of the story. Also I wanted it to come unexpectedly like it did to so many people at the very beginning. As Thomas-Edward says in the epilogue: “this is the story that had to be told: the story of the sun, the earth and the moon.”
Anthony P. Infante, 47, Chatham, N.J.
They are breeding them in captivity then return them to the wild and the plan is having some success.
The challenges over at BPC look so fun...if I can make a dent in my cleaning/organizing, maybe I can participate in one of them.
Of course packin up is a bit more of a production these days, what with the addition of an infant to pack for and all, but the basics stay about the same. Towels, dry clothes, food, water, sunscreen…
Ok.. now don't laugh OK? These are over 10 years old.. give me a break !
He hasn’t replied.
I will be entering the Plein Aire Paint-Out on Friday. It promises to be a fun event for everyone. Bring your umbrella and sun tan lotion!
The synopsis is taken from the inside flap (back cover)
So the old man took pity on me and kicked me down some birthday cash for some new wheels and so I've been sitting on this bike money for awhile now. Once the sun started to shine, Brent dragged me out to the bike shops and I test drove many, many bikes and smiled and nodded and tried to pay attention as many, many bike mechanics explained to me in minute detail the features of many, many different bikes. In case you are wondering, the kids are not very fun to go bike shopping with. I think they honked every single horn and rang every single bell that crossed their paths.
These teams are not starting from scratch. Rather, they are building on the many ongoing efforts of agencies and local partners working collaboratively to conserve whole ecological systems, from the Prairie Potholes, known as the Duck Factory of America, to the Everglades River of Grass, from the California Bay Delta to the Chesapeake. The five demonstration landscapes were identified based on several factors, including the presence of locally-led collaborative efforts where federal agencies can be a strong partner, in part, by better aligning the range of federal conservation investments, resources, and authorities. In consultation with local stakeholders, the interagency teams surveyed existing resources and needs and identified strategies to realign or refocus authorities and activities to both accelerate on-the-ground.
That means we are always on the lookout for real estate. The purchasable kind.
Now Mr Cameron is saying goodbye to all that – no more public money, powers of patronage, honours (it’s fascinating how many of these extremists relish OBEs and knighthoods) and invitations to No 10 for people who do not share the open values of British civil society. His speech is intended to start a process which will run all through government – in schools, universities, prisons, policing, charities, social programmes, urban regeneration. Islamists believe that Islam is a Nation and no other entity deserves respect. Mr Cameron’s 21st-century version of One Nation Conservatism is a full-on rejection of that.
btw, if this doesn’t correspond with your thinking, I recommend that you read Oriana Fallaci’s The Force of Reason. Now there’s an atheist who has long since experienced a baptism of desire… it’s only her personal witness of the corruption of Catholicism which keeps her where she is…
Muslims are welcome to have people like Galloway on their side
Yeast: House London
Now that we’re in the new year I want to start fresh. I want to clean my proverbial slate. I’m going to be better; about everything. I’m going to be a better housewife, a better mother, a better crafter, just all around better.
And you climbed the twilight mountains
Okay, you say. What does all this stuff about ant bites have to do with Mark 14:38 and guarding our minds? Well, as I see it—God has used the ants to show us something. I didn’t put my feet under my desk expecting to have ants bite me. That has never happened to me before—and why should it? If I had known ants were under there, I wouldn’t have willingly offered my feet for them to bite. By the same token—we don’t always see temptation coming. Even when it does show itself, we don’t always take it seriously. We can sometimes just brush it off and keep going along. Temptation will keep ‘picking at you’. When I say temptation, I’m not just talking about the obvious kinds of temptation. I am also referring to the subtle situations that come up when we are fighting discouragement. Those little things that prick your mind and get you thinking in the wrong direction.
When Jesus was nailed onto that cross, God was saying-
This weekend, I began decorating the space. Or as my beloved remarked, “You’ve feathered your nest.” He was joking about the decorative roosters that I’ve scattered around the room. But he was right. I’ve feathered my nest. And I’m pretty happy with the results.
I have finally put down my needle and thread for Easter - and am taking a couple of days break from creating to enjoy some family time over the weekend.
Now where was I? Oh, yeah, the album.
A dedicated Yankees fan, Valdez said she was a bit surprised to learn about the legendary enmity between the Bronx Bombers and the Brooklyn Dodgers. “I didn't know a lot of people didn’t like the Yankees,” she said, noting, “I saw a photo of people cheering at the ’55 World Series. I felt the same way when the Yankees won. It made me cherish the memories more.”
Just a money-saving reminder: this is only a savings if you pay cash for it! It you put it on a credit card, have to pay interest - it's not saving.
421300 Lumber & other construction materials
08 - Justify My Love (Madonna Cover)
Hello, hello! I hope you all had a fabulous weekend, and got to enjoy an extra day off. I'm still recovering from a chocolate coma, but not complaining about that! Last week I showed you Babygirl's Art Party, and this post showed how we made the smocks, placemats and goodie bags. Today I'll show you how to make the pretty dip-dyed streamers and tissue puffs that hung over all the tables.
It's fine to have a few things in your wardrobe that you reserve only for non-work use. As a rule though, I think it's best not to keep too many of them, because for most of us, reserving clothes only for 'special' occasions means they don't get worn enough to make them worth owning. They take up closet space, they're often expensive, and they taunt you day after day with their loveliness while you go schlumping out in your boring black dress slacks and sensible shoes.
Oh and she sure knows how to suffice my romance crave. Especially hot kissing ;)
1 hedge
And it's true that Juliet, Naked isn't always up to scratch. Coming at it after the heights of literary fiction is a bit of a bump, and there is none of the elegant, soothing prose you might find in the pages of other writers. Annie is far from a complete character either, a little too prissy, correct and, above all, right. Just as in High Fidelity, in Juliet, Naked the author has created an example of the typical Hornby couple: a useless, Peter-Pan type man, and a competent, sensible, better woman. Duncan, gormless as he is, receives short shrift from his creator, and that's a shame as the book is actually more interesting when he's around.
Don't get me wrong I'm not some gleeful Pollyanna who sees the best in everything. In fact most of the time I'm downright sad, a deep down, to the bone sadness. It has been this way for as long as I can remember. But here's the rub, I do ‘hear the music’ I can find pleasure and joy in the big as well as the small things, in fact one of my small pleasures, used to be sitting with a pint of Guinness, Evening Standard and a cigarette, in the pub after work. But somebody didn't like me doing that so it had to stop.
EC: ‘No, just make noises’.
I wonder what happens on the "one time out of 10" when your child doesn't get up and follow you...
When I was 8 months pregnant for my first son, I took the car to the car wash. This particular car wash was one where you get the car in the line, then get out, go inside and watch it being washed as you stand behind the glass window. I enjoyed watching the sprays and brushes work, knowing that the car was going to look great when it was done. As the car neared the end of the wash, all of a sudden it dawned on me that I had locked the door with the keys inside when I got out!! In a panic, I rushed over to the attendant inside the building and told him of my dilemma. I just KNEW that the car behind mine was going to crash into the back of mine once the power push was no longer in control and that it was up to the attendant to get inside the car and move it out-of-the-way. HOW was that going to happen when he couldn’t get in the car???? I must have been a real mess – hugely pregnant, red in the face and worried about messing the car up. How would I explain this to my husband, or insurance company??? That was almost 29 years ago. I don’t remember how they managed it, but they got the car moved off the runner and out-of-the-way for the next car to get through. Boy, did I feel foolish!
Well it's photo wednesday again, oh how the time flies...
ILL BILL on We the People Festival:
Their 2015 succession politics is not my headache because only God knows what would happen in 2015. The problem is that their succession chess game is leading to the death of numerous shoe and shoeless Nigerians and creating a pathological hatred between the Christians and Muslims of this country and the north and south of Nigeria, a trend which if not arrested, will lead to a civil war.
-buttercream
RifRaf: Are you not interested anymore in Icelandic music output?
The Albany Times-Union, in an 8/25/04 editorial headlined "And now, the cover-up," wrote:
ISBN-13: 978-1434700643
Our destination was a ranch between Hico and Stephenville in sort-of north central west Texas. It's about a 2 1/2 hour drive from Austin, which is like driving to the grocery store for many Texans. We drove past marvelously-named towns like Pancake, Fairy, and Dublin. (There's an Ireland relatively close by as well). We stopped in Gatesville (home of the Texas women's prison) for a bathroom break, which is only worth mentioning because they had installed hand dryers that blew so hard that the skin on my hands rippled like those pictures you see of pilots undergoing G-force gravity. It was repulsive, yet fascinating. My hands were dry when I left the bathroom, that's for sure.
There are three castes, or groups, of people co-existing within the city walls: The RedBlacks and their kin - natives of the city who rule the businesses and the streets; the Gypsies - who fled their native home of Norway during the war and who now hide from the RedBlacks underground, calling the twisted system of tunnels and trapdoors their homes; and then there are the two Swedes who can control the birds - Zvominir and his son Morgan.
Commentary.
Some people are comparing Mayor Sara Duterte to action king FPJ. Now that’s what you call South Poe.
The older I get, the broader my tastes become. Recently I got on a British glam kick after watching the British version of “Life on Mars”. I recognized the songs, but did not know that they were so awesome. I wanted to hear them more. Mostly, this drove me to seek out T. Rex and Mr.Eno’s old band, Roxy Music. Thank you, Itunes, for making it possible to purchase these classics without having to go down to the local record store.
- From March 1 through March 22, over 6,000 daily record highs were broken in the US.
the need for an Identification kit. In fact most people
Girl, I have GOT to have that nap. Like I said, they have no interaction with each other during that time. But even if they did, we don't have a big problem with them fussing or not getting along. They are very loving and kind to each other. I say that not to sound like I have it all perfect because I definitely don't. I say that to let people know that it is possible for brothers and sister to really get
here in Britain, we have a number of competing budget airlines who offer what look like unfeasibly cheap deals. There's usually a catch.... Like I can get to Barcelona for twenty pounds. But how much is the ticket back?
Liam Burns, the president of the National Union of Students, is calling for university lecturers to be forced to acquire teaching qualifications to ensure that students paying tuition fees are getting the most out of their degrees.
The serviced apartment we're living in has an oven!
They will be making their first appearance in the next couple of weeks, and I am absolutely sure that you will be as blown away with their creativity as we were.
I have vowed to myself that N will never get one more minute of my life than I’m required to give. Even if I have to suffer consequences by refusing to comply with cajoling, begging, threatening, and ”logic,” I will not give in. N will never again take up residency in me.
And soaring disappeared from view
I'd hoped and wanted to live in San Francisco since I moved to California, and sometimes it just seemed like a foregone conclusion I'd be here sooner or later. Still, if a cheap room in a great house with awesome people I knew hadn't opened up, I may not have come here just yet. I had finished grad school and was looking for opportunity, whereever she may find me.
Seau was a guy whose career I followed, even rooting for the Patriots a little so he might finally get that Super Bowl ring. I wish 1994 had ended with a Chargers Championship and Seau playing out the rest of his career with them. But what we want and what happens are many times two different things. He was a major part of my growing up with football and I’m saddened his life ended in such a way.
An ice cream cone on a warm summer night from the van that plays a tune.
And these are little mini puddings covered in chocolate. They look best with white chocolate on top to look like the cream on top of the pudding but I just couldn't be bothered to be honest :)
You now know that you should have been building infrastructure. Why, for instance, was the new edition of A Princess of Mars (with that eye-catching intro by Junot Diaz, the second Pulitzer winning novelist attached to the project) released AFTER the film? You should have pushed that through the presses as soon as you green lighted the movie. Ditto on a new comic book adaptation (from a market-dominating publisher like Marvel, not the very respectable but very tiny Dynamite or Dark Horse who both have miniscule Mars niches). Or what about an animated TV series on Cartoon Network? Or a series of animated films the way DC keeps its roster of superheroes alive and literally kicking while hatching long-term blockbusters?
She has been through some major events in her life these last few years and one would have to be totally numb not to have been touched.
About a week ago a girl from my work told me that she had some things she was getting rid of and wanted to know if I was interested in them. After finding out it was some clothes and a little bit of jewelry I said sure figuring free clothes are always great and if I didn’t care for them, they were free, no big deal.
Common names: Red Head (E), Sanalo-todo (S), Ix-canan, Sac-te-much, Klaush-pim (M)
I seriously did a big ol' happy dance when I got an invitation from Katie last week to participate in the winter edition of the Pinterest Challenge. I started reading Young House Love back when it was This Young House about three years ago now, and then got caught up in the bacon-stravaganza at Bower Power not too much later. So it kind of feels like these girls are family! And I'm glad to get to know Cassie at Hi Sugarplum, too!
The sheer weight of massive glaciers that rest atop active seismic areas help minimize plate tectonic movements. "But, as the glaciers melt and their load on the plate lessens, there is a greater likelihood of an earthquake happening to relieve the large strain underneath."
Objective: rigorously tackling an individual’s obstacles to a life in work.
The only person who understood the gravity of the situation was the 50 something. I think they were all drugged, but maybe not the one in her 50′s. The eighty year old was very gummy and docile.
It should now be clear how vastly different these two worlds of older WoW and current WoW are. In the former game, the player experienced a game that was ongoing and natural, and most importantly, honest. At each step she succeeded or failed, and consequences flowed from that. She was Theseus, using whatever resources were available to overcome each foe. In the current game, without the chance of success or failure, there is no such drama. Blizzard, in their wisdom, have sought to protect the player from the dreaded nightmare of his own failure. In doing so, they have turned him into Sisyphus: proceeding along ever upwards, but with no ability to influence his own fate.
So what are your thoughts on the advantages of being a perpetual student? Share them in the comment section below.
The challenge over on Whoopsidaisy is Lets Get All Cute...the Dt have produced the most amazing samples so for masses of inspiration pop over and take a peek
Note: ( you can double this recipe very easily, and if you like meat just add to the Ricotta Mixture)
Albion Hotel
It just seemed like a perfect idea and combination when I pictured the cake. I imagined a perfect layering, with a little crunch in the middle, and definitely chocolate macaron decoration, secretly hoping that my coworker is not allergic to one of them.
8 weeks…
One thing that I love about photography is that it allows me to create beautiful images of things that are dangerous to me, so that I can enjoy them without suffering. Take horses for example. I find horses so majestic and graceful, and I am very drawn to them. Living in a rural area, we would be hard pressed to go for a drive and not see horses, and I think my husband gets tired of me making him stop the car for photo ops.
Triangles and threes as life repeats in perfect cycles like algebraic equations of existence.
Corn flour, 1 table spoon
That said, I continually educate myself on reality and the reason why my views to some may seem extreme is only because I've looked at the situation from all possible angles.
Best part of the evening -- I asked Chip if I could use the loud speaker system to wish George a Happy Birthday. Wow!! Then everyone joined in, singing Happy Birthday to George. He handled it well.
Norquist reminds me a bit of Robert Caro’s portrayal of Robert Moses in New York City. Neither Norquist nor Moses have occupied top positions of power themselves. But both show brilliance in capturing the levers of power – in punching well above their weight, as the expression goes. Norquist is the originator of the anti-tax pledge that he’s forced all Republicans in Congress to sign. To get into office, or to stay there once elected, a Republican politician has to promise not to vote to raise taxes ever, in any form. Those in office who stray from that pledge face a primary challenge funded by Norquist supporters, and many have lost. The message is clear: funding the federal government is evil.
164. Bite of Thai Salad w/ Peanut Sauce @ Thai Spice Cuisine - 12:54 p.m.
What gave birth to it while The Earlier Ones were programmed the same way as Neo?
Nor, they say, is life “sacred”. The only relevant difference between life and death is the existence of abilities – and a brain-damaged person no longer has these.
Lt. Richard Hardrick
“How could one man’s absence reduce a woman to nothing?” Mehnaz asks observing a paternal aunt of hers whose husband left her for good.
Since then, the power has been out and we haven't had any heat or access to phones (to the states) or Internet (except Doug getting one e-mail out from the hospital.) Friday evening we moved our friends in with us (Tami and Wes and three kids) since they just shipped all of their stuff to the states in preparation for their move in two weeks. It's been nice to have them around because everyone is on edge and extremely stressed. (And Tami is very cool under pressure! She's amazing. Me, not so much turns out.)
Boy 1: 4:30.
Clipper City Brewing Co. Heavy Seas - Peg Leg (Imperial Stout)
Indeed it would be quite correct to say, that so blinded have the majority become that salvation on pro-indigenous terms may now never occur, I write this with a deep sense of sorrow both for my countrymen and my nationalist fellows and indeed myself. For my beliefs I have endured a fair amount, not so much legally and such but physically, I spent perhaps two decades defending, if that is the word, upon the streets, I became almost the last of my kind in many ways and faced terrific attack because of it. Yet growing up, in my now rapidly declining youth I had little care as to others, little care as to the gnashing of leftists, the, in the main, impotent ranting of non-whites, I believed wholeheartedly in race and nation. Yet through it all it was never about hate, although one must, in order to defend oneself submit to other instincts, it was, at least for me, all about love, I loved the very ground upon which I walked and I wished to preserve my culture and kind for the future.
The Bridport Open Book Festival is the celebration of the written word that surrounds one of the most respected story and poetry competitions in the English speaking world – The Bridport Prize.
Top 10 Authors:
The state shall protect antiquities, archaeological and heritage sites and objects of artistic, historical and cultural value.
But when it comes to finances and weight-loss, I find that guilt is only good for engendering more guilt. It goes something like this: I eat half a cake. I feel terrible about it. How could I eat half a cake in one sitting? My guilt motivates me to be good. Not just good. Perfect. I am not going to eat dessert for the rest of the month. Day 1 goes well. So do days 2, 3, 4 and maybe even 5. Then I’m at a birthday party and lo! there are cupcakes. Well, I don’t want to be rude, but I’m restricting myself to just one. After all, I’ve been so impressively good, I kind of deserve a treat.
What happens in a Cornered Cat class? Lots of great stuff! In this two-day class, I work with people who are already basically familiar with their guns and help them reach a more confident skill level, so that handling the gun comes much more naturally to them. What do you do if the gun doesn't fire when you expect it to? How do you reload it efficiently? Can you stay hidden behind a doorway or a piece of furniture and still hit a bad guy? Can you hit the target while moving away from danger, or in low light? Should you even try? These are the types of questions we deal with, because they teach us how we might use the gun in the real world, not just for plinking at the range. These are tough topics, but important ones. After all, the real world includes innocent bystanders. We owe it to them to learn real-life skills, so we don't endanger others when we defend ourselves.
These days I don’t post as much as I would like but I’m looking to rectify that. I’m also looking to start a long-overdue v-log series on ChiRunning 101. Stay tuned for the first instalment this week.
But what about Darth Stitch? you may be asking. Well, technically, Darth Stitch is still my mother's, so his fate will be up to her. As much as I love and have come to respect him, as much as he's taught me, the student's ambitions are starting to surpass the master's capabilities, I fear. It's high time to move on. I'm going to suggest that we give him to my aunt and cousins, who are always coming over here to patch things. Not that I mind having them, quite the contrary. But still. The desire to give good machines to good homes is universal.
She's aiming for 1000!! If you visit her blog you'll see the 143 she's already received. I think there's a Flickr group too (and Facebook).
So because of my reason (and Mr. Scottish’s reason), we will definitely not be having anything monogram-ed at the wedding.
So after my friend selected a pattern that she loved and paint color for the chair, I got busy cleaning her up.
Here I am in Omaha, Nebraska unable to get back to sleep. I just read a really good 9/11 blog post by Patti Digh, "remember". She writes well about what it was like for her that day. She also talks about how polarized and hateful things are in the US right now. However, she brings it home to what matters: living your life now to the fullest.
Just now, I have received by mail an ad from a journal called “The American Conservative”. This journal opposes the coming war with Iran, just like all other “imperialist wars”, out of conservative, anti-statist values. “War,” write the editors, “is in fact the true nurse of executive aggrandizement”. So it seems that in the American right, too, people recognize the “cow paradox” and are consistent with their anti-statist approach.
I’ve often said that some CAMRA members are wannabe civil servants – they love to make things really bureaucratic. Think of any CAMRA beer festival: very often, you pay your admission here, then get you glass there, and the beer tokens are on sale on the far wall in the main room. Some festivals have you queuing three times before you sip your first pint. For Liverpool, add in the fact that actually obtaining your tickets is a bureaucracy of Byzantine proportions. It takes more than 800 words on the webpage just to explain how to buy tickets; click here to see. I used to work for the DSS and, as I recall, none of its systems were as convoluted as this.
4. Coldplay – “Every Teardrop Is A Waterfall” I like that Chris is trying to vamp up the crowd like he’s in The Prodigy, but this just isn’t that kind of music. He looked and sounded tired. While his singing was much better than in their first song, he still sounded bleary and out of breath. Kathy said that he’s getting too for this shit, and I’m inclined to agree.
Through empty caverns
If you can’t agree on something, then don’t talk about it – a perfect example of what happens when Consensus is enshrined above all else. I suppose that proves their point. “Well, wasn’t the lack of consensus what caused the unpleasantness in the first place?” I suppose; if everyone had agreed to be run by the Germans, there wouldn’t have been war. Peace is a value equivalent to Consensus; if they made statues today of allegorical figures, you wouldn’t have Truth and Justice, but Consensus and Peace. A continent run by Nazis would be technically peaceful, since the internal repression wouldn’t be regarded as a breach of peace. They could burn every untermensch from the Urals to the Portuguese shore, but as long as one government controlled everything, and wasn’t at war with another discrete political entity, there would be Peace.
One story he told us was about the spree of murders that occurred in Seattle and how he was the main prosecutor of the case, and when there wasn’t much evidence, he investigated himself at the crime scene of one Holly Puentez, stabbed multiple times with a switch blade, and Uncle Kent found a shoe print near the door step that was fading because of a lack of police competency. Unfortunately, the shoe print was too faded and too tampered with to be in consideration for evidence, but everyone in Seattle knows that it would have sealed the case.
In an attempt to sanitise the problem, the South African government has banned the use of the term "farm murders". The intent is to present the farm murders as random events rather than the ethnically targeted murders that they really are.
But still, the question hangs in the air. I have the distinct impression I have passed a point in my life where my I can't pretend to be young anymore. That's physically young, mind you. I refuse to become a grumpy old man and fight with my contemporaries who have begun to do so. Modern life in not rubbish and there were far more frightening things around in the past. Just watching Top of the Pops form 1976 is enough to confirm that. I listen to new music and although modern pop can sound derivative and shallow I will just have to refer the honourable member back to Top of the Pop from 1976 again.
According to Dr Lombardo, The benefits of implementing SUPER BODY, SUPER BRAIN may fall into three major groups:
This is what happens when the death instinct takes hold of the super-ego and turns on the ego. During the process of sublimation—the love-instinct and death-instinct (formerly fused) become separated; and the latter ends up in the super-ego causing it to “rage” against the ego. Sometimes the ego’s unfortunate position can result in obsessional neuroses, hysteria, and even suicide—depending on the ego’s reaction to the super-ego’s chastisement.
From Babycenter:
Looking out the window onto the veranda is uplifting when the roses are in bloom. I planted a grapevine further along, into a couple of tyres and have big expectations for equally bountiful harvests of grapes!
The matter has now been made all the more compelling by the revelation of apparent parallels, over the similar involvement with Khazakhstan.
I stumbled upon this slinky little number in a roundabout fashion at 5am this morning, having woken from a slew of nightmares one of which featured a bag of flesh hungry caterpillars and a lady appearing in my toilet, warning me not to eat the chicken at my local Chinese take away.
That same day a 46-year-old Afrikaner was shot through his bedroom window as he slept at his farm near Potchefstroom. A few days later a 61-year-old was stabbed to death in his bed at a farm in Limpopo.
Thank you for sharing with us Linda!
That's the first part of brave. It's bravery that's never mentioned and seldom rewarded. That neglect doesn't diminish the scope or value of the bravery in the slightest. What you did remains an act of singular courage.
Of The Holy Spirit.
Debts.
Like Miklós Jancsó's The Round-Up (1966), a recognisable 'historical' setting is used to explore a series of contemporary concerns. 'The village' of the title becomes a metaphor for America in the shadow of 9/11; fearful and hermetic; fuelled by scaremongering and propaganda tactics that impose order, conformity and control. The 'monsters' that breach the periphery of this prison-as-village manifestation are representations of a society so blinded by pious self-righteousness that they fail to recognise violence and resentment as inherently human traits. In doing so, these characters effectively initiate their own downfall, but refuse to acknowledge it as anything less than a personal utopia.
And riding on a sled through falling snow
Izzy turned to her little sister. “Hen, tell Mom you need to go to the bathroom,” she whispered.
Otherwise known as “The Boss”.
When I think about the latest Twitterstorm, involving the alleged naming of a rape victim, I am reminded of an old Anonymous saying: “Because none of us is as cruel as all of us.” I think it sums up nicely the attitude and perhaps the outcome of of the behaviour of some people on Twitter.
What little or big things can you do to make your freedom dreams come true?
In any sort of motion photography, panning with your subject can take a little getting used to, because you’ve got to find the right speed to pan your camera at. Do it too fast, and the shutter has closed before your subject has even entered the frame. Do it too slow, and your subject has left the frame before the shutter has closed.
Let them weep! let them weep!
when so soon her face has lost her
The tragic conclusion to the film documents the collapse of protagonist Johnny (Peter Breck) into a state of catatonic schizophrenia, but this outcome holds little surprise for either Cathy (Constance Towers) or the spectator. Johnny’s psychological collapse was, from Johnny’s introductory voiceover announcing his defeat, inevitable. If not a self-fufilling prophecy as such, his final insanity was at least a self-motivated one. The distinction between sanity and insanity is tenuous from the outset – that Johnny and his colleagues so haphazardly tempt fate seems, for Cathy at least, to be asking for trouble. As the films primary metaphor for division, the sane/insane binary is predicated upon Johnny’s final (and seemingly irreversible) collapse into a catatonic schizophrenic state. Johnny’s “schizophrenia” (the process of division) takes different forms, where even his occupation as a journalist shifts him from an objective onlooker to a subjective centre of experience. Johnny’s decay into schizophrenia is active, loaded with high-energy visuals (such as the famous colourised waterfall sequence), and functions in stark comparison to his passive (and somewhat arrogant) resignation to his role as Deceiver, the ambitious trickster who is trumped by his own game. With his collapse, Johnny is at last liberated from his own fictions and self-delusions. As hero – or at least protagonist – of Shock Corridor, Johnny’s journey marks a shift from one narrative stream (sane) to another (insane).
More coming soon!
The appearance and reappearance of various tragic characters. So much plastic surgery.
I am a card carrying Christian who is open to Eastern Spiritual Belief systems and practices. I am aware that the birth of Jesus Christ does not fall squarely on December 25th according to "the facts". I understand the month of December to be a month of holidays, as well as, religious and spiritual remembrances.
Is there anything I have forgotten about the first three princesses?
Make the recipe for the original inception cookie-dough and instead of Double Stuffed, buy a bag of Mini Oreos. These are perfect since they are actually the size of a "normal" cookie, although I thought of them as "mini" and ate a bunch...that's how that works right?
The incomparable Fairuz sings over the noise in the square
I really hate to be against parks. In fact if it were 30 years ago and I had not seen the de-evolution of local culture or I had not had to put up with the litter and crime associated with parks near places I farm, (Deer Creek Park, The park on Mill Creek next to Harmony Road and Hwy 18, the unofficial and illegal park at the former Green Bridge, old park at the dump known as Monroe Landing,) I would be in favor of the park. It is kind of a neat design.
ARGH I AM SO SORRY THAT I AM NOT DOING THINGS FOR YOU!!!!
Tacoma won the rubber match against Tucson, 6-4, and took the series two games to one.
A mental shift is needed to aid this nation's future matriculants to be all they can be. Here are five actions that we could implement to make that happen.
Happiness is not something that you can switch on and off, but it is something that you can experience when you associate yourself with things that make you happy! Take the weekend to surround yourself with things that make you happy.
As I've just got back from a 12 hour overnight coach journey (turns out Lyon and Bologna, while geographically rather close, are a nightmare transport-wise) I will wait until tomorrow, when it hopefully won't take me an hour to write 3 sentences, to reveal what I made.
Kids Ride 8 years to 13 years 3 km
Moors
Just SAVE and PRINT on cardstock!
Disobeying and saying no
- Choose white as your background colour and your second font (violation)
No wonder then that we will bring out our credit card once again, and charge away. After all, even those poor credit cards companies need warmth and joy this season. We're all dreaming the same dream.
But then…you see her with Jack, her childhood friend, and the dog she left with him years ago, and you see genuine love. The actress is phenomenal as you watch her compartmentalize those feelings to keep on track. For weeks, I kept wishing that Amanda would abandon her mission and find happiness with Jack. It was a possibility, and although I knew it wouldn’t happen, it didn’t stop me from hoping. I guess that’s the romantic in me.
I didn't create this so much as a "survival" kit as I did as a supplement to items I already carry on my person (keychain: Sharpie Mini, duct tape fob, whistle, Gerber Tempo flashlight, Vic Classic, pockets: SRM 710 as primary blade, Gerber Paraframe Mini as my secondary, bag: OTC medications, dental stuff). Because of this, I didn't feel as though I needed to add water purification tablets, tinder, a button compass, or the like. These are more for my daily urban "survival." A more survival based kit is kept in my car and is a whole 'nother story.
Misc Fake Flower, Lace Ribbon, Manila Tag, Tulle, skewer
The Writing World is coming up to it's first Birthday. We are exactly 77 days away. I'd love to do an awesome giveaway for this event. Therefore, I am looking for Authors who are willing to donate one of their books for a "Book Prize Package".
Earlier this month I had a brilliant opportunity to have lunch with a girlfriend – and we chose Chin Chin! You just can’t go wrong there… the food is always so lush and great! It has a great vibe, and yes – it does get really busy – but they’re just churning out such amazing food and drinks, you can understand why! I have already reviewed Chin Chin (see here) – but given we tried some different things this time around… I thought you might be interested…
Noon: Leon Bibb (solo)
Life abroad hasn't really worked out that way for me, though -- this has always been a new kind of survival mode. I've found that relationships with mountains can be abusive yet forgiving in the end but something you really have to work on. People don't always embrace the quality of forgiveness quite as easily. Countries and cultures are the same. They don't have to love you for all of your flaws if they don't want to or try to be understanding -- they can just drop you and be done with you. I've seen a lot of friendships come and go in my time here, for whatever reason. I learned how to sort through the people I surround myself with so that I keep the ones I want to, and release the ones bringing bad vibes my way.
I follow Felicity Gerry and John Cooper QC on twitter. Indeed, I have had the pleasure of doing podcasts with both (See links supra) – podcasts which have had many thousands of downloads and have been well received because of the incisive commentary on diversity, the riots, sentencing issues provided by experienced members of the bar – comment provided by both free. Their tweets are informative and they are both more than happy to engage and debate with lawyer and non-lawyer alike. I have not seen either of them touting for work.
you earned it
Now let's talk about politics.
Heart in my throat, I politely emailed my U.S. editor and explained that I couldn't do what she'd asked me to do, and why. I braced myself, not sure what the reaction would be. I'd heard so many things about awkward authors who thought their words were golden, and I didn't want to be like that, so the minute I sent the email I wanted to call it back, but no matter how I looked at it, I just knew I couldn't change the story that way.
Anyway, I'm currently working on some new projects which are really exciting but also really time-consuming, so for the next few weeks posting will continue to be sporadic. I just wanted to let you know that I'm not dead or trapped under something heavy, and to thank you for your patience!
Each region of Italy has their own unique food and desserts to mark the Feast. In Abruzzi, people eat “Covezun di San Giuseppe”, a tiny baked turnover filled with chopped walnuts and chocolate.
Paul Wall and Gu-U checking out some pieces of vinyl once owned by DJ Screw. I personally am super stoked to check all this out. So excited to see the University of Houston, a school where I once attended one semester and I'm pretty sure failed remedial math (wasn't my fault), is doing something so cool. Literally repping their hood for real.
I hope whoever reads this will take the effort to go to this quaint little shop and check it out before it closes. This is a little piece of Singapore history that is about to be lost. Forever.
This question had me do a lot of thinking and here are my thoughts in a nutshell. (Austin Powers moment: how did a nut, get into a shell like this?)
But nestled into the middle of all this, right after some of the most disturbing scenes in the book, we find a very beautiful part of John’s vision. In Revelation 7:9-10 is written: “After this I looked, and there was a great multitude that no one could count, from every nation, from all tribes and peoples and languages, standing before the throne and before the Lamb, robed in white, with palm branches in their hands. They cried out in a loud voice saying, ‘Salvation belongs to our God who is seated on the throne, and to the Lamb!’”
Bret cut him off, and said he is all style, and no substance. He needs to be a real champion, a man who defends his title night in, night out, and leaves everything in the ring. That is how someone can become the best they are, the best was, and the best they ever will be.
“I’ve felt lonely for a while now,” were the first words uttered. “It’s been 22,000 years and I’m starting to hunger for something more.”
They even called Torshavn on DSC to check the DSC system was working, afterwards:
LauraB
An environmental report on the building, which once housed the The Argus newspaper, also revealed it was contaminated with pigeon excrement.
I only remember a few things that happened after that, as I traveled in and out of delirium: the paramedics arriving, the inside of an ambulance, and then I awoke in a hospital room. I gave a formal report to the police containing everything that had happened, including a retelling of Mel’s original story from nineteen eighty-three, and made my way away from the town as quickly as I could.
Friday morning I flew into the big apple. Alone. With directions and a location to pick up his apartment key. I hopped in a cab and made my way to the lower east side to the Klean and Kleaner laundromat where a key was left in an envelope for me to retrieve. Funny thing is? The key wouldn't actually open the outside door. Nice. A fellow tenant was leaving so I was able to sneak in. Luckily the key to his actual apartment let me inside. I have to give NYC credit for making every space usable. Small would describe the apartment. But it definitely had it's unique characteristics. And a spiral staircase.
Next we stop school and do our real morning routine. For me this means brush my teeth, wash my face and put on make up, and get dressed. My daughter brushes her teeth, makes her bed, and gets dressed.
Rifts – Promise of Power (N-Gage)
Small signs are sometimes the best possible fuel consumption and emissions. A car owner time-warped here from the new bmw x5 and barely feels any cheaper. The warm orange ambient lighting is a different car than its angular predecessor. At the bmw x5 screensaver and stretched headlamps also help make this the most powerful diesel-drinking engine ever to emerge from the modified bmw x5, the bmw x5 screensaver an advert for grasping the black handled pump.
And let me emphasize…its stress management…not stress reduction…that an organization needs to help an employee deal with….
Marilyin McCoo and Billy Davis Jr are back with You Don't Have to be a Star.
And I did. Made him give the car he was driving back to my ex-husband who bought it for him (and he never made a single payment back for it in two years). And yesterday I shut off his phone (which is on my account and he also doesn’t pay for). Without a phone, he will not be able to speak any more lies to me. Bravo!!! Right?
Brycen loves drinking milk and water. He gets milk with breakfast every morning in a sippy cup. He doesn't eat cold cereal yet, he really likes eating cereal bars and wants one every morning for breakfast. He drinks his milk as well as water in another cup throughout the day. Every now and then he gets juice, but we give that to him as a treat. Sometimes we give him tastes of sugar free and caffeine free soda as another treat. But he's been so good with his water and milk, it's been great!
I've been away for a while taking care of my new baby boy and already doing my best to raise him a Mets fan despite living in the northwest suburbs of Chicago (the Mets won the first game I had him watch with me against the Cubs).
These gorgeous highly embellished Marie Antoinette Monogram tags are perfect for so many occasions. Wedding, shower, engagement party, birthday or any event where you want to present something beauitful and outside of what you would normally see. Tie them to gifts, give as favors or hang on your French themed Christmas tree.
This adorable image is from Peggy's Collection of Cuties 2!! LOOOOVE them! She's got a collection of vintage images that would be perfect for whatever you're looking for! So if you've never been there to look around, and you like vintage images, what the heck are you waiting for? LOL! Hop over to Peggy Loves Vintage and check them all out! I'd recommend following her blog as well. She LOVES to give away free images! The Dp's are Pion Design from a friend (thank you so much!!) matted with Bazzill cardstock. I added some lace from my stash and used one of my old Martha Stewart heart border punch. The sentiment is from Whimsy Stamps and I also used some May Arts silk ribbon, a button, and used my pearl pen. I also did some machine stitching.
We spent a long time saying goodbye and looking at maps for the rest of the way. Salt Lake had been awarded the 2002 Winter Olympics and Maun and I had brought a few commemorative pins as souveniers and our hosts were very excited when we gave them one. It was a nice way to end what had been maybe our most pleasant cycling day in Hungary. During the entire evening we had been the only guests in the restaurant, we certainly hope things are working out for such nice people.
I hope that you share those wonderful experiences with me. I hope I can create some of those experiences for you. I’ve loved watching you grow up. And I will continue to do so until the day I die.
Over the next few months, I’ll write about my new (and perhaps selective recurring but interesting) Pittsburgh experiences. Maybe by the end of the summer I’ll have to change my user name to yinzerinpittsburgh. But I’ll start out small. To get myself acclimated, I’ve compiled a list of summer essentials that make me feel at home. These are things one could find in Hawaii, Pittsburgh, or even Smallville; let’s call them my (domestic) creature comforts of the season.
In between his travels he philosophises about books and their owners, and there are many truths in there, including:
I was, I’ll admit, depressed by this. Plus frustrated in an all too familiar way. And feeling trapped.
Just got a message promoting a Social Networking website -- seems like a pretty cool way to get beer lovers together.
Thanks so much for stopping by today! Have a wonderful weekend everyone!!
Forever spoken
Entry..
Personally I believe that although it can lead to misery and distress for sufferers and their families, it can be so, so much more.
BF: Yes. It was Pentagon white hats saying to the elite, “You’re not going to destroy the surface of the planet and escape yourselves.
Dear Madrid, See you in 14 weeks. Love, Christy.
Two weekends ago, the weather was miserable: downpour all day long. Sick of being stuck inside, I immediately sent a mass e-mail to all my friends about a picnic for the following Sunday. What I didn’t do was make sure the weather was okay. Forecast for Sunday on Monday prior: rain and cold….. Oops. I wasn’t deterred because they are off in predictions sometimes and hoped my instincts were right. Sadly, I checked the weather everyday until Thursday to find no significant changes -forecast of rain and temperatures in the 40s…. I sent an e-mail later that day cancelling the picnic, and I made alternate plans to go hiking on the Billy Goat Trail (you can hike in any weather) and tutor kids.
I’m always interested in religious people who claim to have a rational (or rough equivalent) argument for their religiousness, so I poked around the web a bit, and found a site that has a bunch of his papers, and I read a couple of them.
lights, who does not change like the shifting shadows."
Though the women have been in custody for several months, appearing in several preliminary hearings, no trial date has been set. Because there is no law in Zimbabwe criminalising rape by women they have been charged with aggravated indecent assault. The anger is such that, according to their lawyer, they have received death threats.
He shook her once. "You were not bidden to come here. If you speak that lie again, so help me, I will not order you beaten, I will do it myself!"
The view is beautiful and the orphanage is more like an inn from the outside. What gives it away is the playground outside. This orphanage has mostly typical children who actually attend Kindergarten. The director told us that she only has 3 special needs children and all 3 have down syndrome. The good news is that 2 of the 3 have families one being my Joshua. The director stated that Bulgaria was trying to integrate special needs children with typical children so this is why they sent her these 3 children. She stated that she has really enjoyed bringing these children to health especially Joshua who arrived very thin and weak. She stated he was unable to walk when he arrived but they worked with him and it has only been recently that he has learned to walk and climb up the stairs. Joshua will be 7 in April. He still requires someone to feed him and dress him. He does not know how to play with toys and he has no interest. He does still have the orphanage behaviors of rocking and frequently makes faces and plays with his fingers. I was very thankful for the work that the caregivers and director have done because form the pictures they had in 1 year truly made a difference. The director was also very happy and satisfied that Joshua had an experienced family and frequently stated that in the US he would have an opportunity since here no one ever inquired about wanting to adopt him.
19. Jane Eyre - Charlotte Bronte
6½ cups unbleached all purpose flour + 1 tbs salt, mix
My mom has requested a new bag to take to work--she works in a factory so I am going to try to find some heavy duty fabric that fits my mom's not-so-girly personality and make her a nice tote bag!
Versa Fine Black
“What did you do to him?” Sybil demanded, practically leaning across Maggie.
Away from me, all who do evil! The LORD has heard my weeping.
-Add in the butter ,egg yolk,vanilla essence,Caramelised sugar syrup to the dry ingredients and then finally add the egg white.Mix well and add in the half cup of milk and batter should not be very loose or very thick.
This beautiful design, called Hollywood Glamour Chandelier, would be an elegant and dramatic way to set the tone for your elegant wedding or event. The background is white with a black border and a black chandelier.
Stories: “A New Room by the Sea” and “Sand Castle”
1. I was crossing the border with two passports, two different license plates, a temporary driver’s license, a newly acquired vehicle
will be a real accomplishment!
The Western allies did not hunt Slobodan Milosevic, Saddam Hussein and Muammar al-Gaddafi because of their bad politics, but because of their good ones. All the three can be seen as symbols for different versions of a “dictatorship for development”. This includes social politics for the masses and national economic modernization. Yugoslavia, Iraq and Libya for some decades used a huge amount of public money to modernise society. Instead of administering the state in favour of foreign investors, they used the means of the nationalization of industries for social, and regional development. Western firms had only restricted access to the markets. This was one of the reasons why Milosevic, Saddam Hussein and Gaddafi were considered as “odious” by Western media and politicians.
Autumn has made it's way inside this week, with these sweet little hanging type things Riley made at kinder.
Ben told me that, even before he went to North Korea, he had started keeping a diary.
I barely make it through half a box of matzah usually, but since I was feeling so awful all week, I ate my fare share. It was all whole wheat, of course . Matzah gets a bad rap from the white flour kind, which causes some “irregularity”, especially combined with the mass quantities of meat, eggs, and processed passover convenience products most observers consume. I treat Passover as a time of rebirth; it is known as Mezeg Ha’Aviv, which means holiday of the Spring. This season is synonymous with trees blooming, crops growing, and getting a fresh start on reinvigorating your routine after a winter of hibernation. Thus, I like to use the dietary restrictions of Passover as an excuse for a “cleanse” or “detox”. I don’t buy any boxed or packaged processed products, and eat mostly fruits, veggies, some dairy/eggs, nuts, and quinoa (which I know is controversial, but as a vegetarian and sometimes vegan ashkenaz Jew, I have to put my foot down somewhere against the semantics of modern rulings). There was even one year when the only matzah I ingested was at the seder, and it was literally a bite. The rest of the week was very clean, and I dropped the last few lbs stored up from the winter.
We have 4 little dogs who live with us. BG (Baby Girl) is a rat terrorist (yes, terrorist)--Cheeze Rodrigues is a long haired chihuahua who weighs 3 pounds on a fat day--Betty Gonzollez (love child of those two)--and Lady Bug who is a boston terrier/chihuahua who I saved from a busy road, snatched from the jaws of death, kept from allowing a Wal-mart truck from turning into a pancake. Hubby made me a great fish pond next to the front porch. It is about 6 x 12. Sometimes we feel like every frog in the county has moved into that pond!! When the population gets too large, we catch as many as possible and move them to the creek on the far side of the field in front of the house.
(And sorry about the weeds, we’re addressing this soon. I prefer to call them ground cover.)
"Can't complain Green, can't complain. Gotta say though love, you're still looking shit!"
When we got there I just stood there as I had stood in the living room not knowing exactly what to do. I watched him go into the closet. There was only one thing that could mean. When he came out I saw that I was wrong. There were two things that could mean. He came near the bed and tossed the two things onto the the quilt. I looked at the hanger and the belt and then I dared a look into his eyes. I saw determination. I tried to soften him I wrapped my arms around his waist but he didn't return the hug. He peeled my arms right back off and I heard myself say 'Babe...' one last effort to try to earn his mercy.
The ads have actually been out for more than a year but somehow I missed them. You might also have missed a couple of really amazing ads I featured earlier.
For half moons I used She 230.
Since starting the blog, my gaming has increased and my painting has improved in both speed and quality, I've also made some good friends along the way. I've probably spent a bit more than I planned, but hey, nobody's perfect.
For they did not store it that it might belong to others,
Efforts to improve the TV-watching experience have often gone wrong because they took people at their word. The past ten years have seen a parade of websites and set-top boxes—Apple TV, Boxee, Joost, Roku—offering a huge range of content and interactive features. All promised to deliver TV the way people (that is, individuals) really want it.... Efforts to turn TVs into personal e-mail devices and home-shopping outlets have fared no better. “The killer application on television turns out to be television,” says Richard Lindsay-Davies, CEO of the Digital TV Group.
Gay men get to have all the fun. I mean, where is my fag hag? Sure, there was a time when my sexuality was straddling both sides of the fence and maybe I was even considered one – but truly – now that I’m in a stable lesbiana relationship, I want my stable (or unstable even) MALE, fag hag! Where is he?
Rather than dwell overlong on how awesome I am (which I do a lot of, I know...), I thought I'd share the secrets of how I did it. If nothing else, I want a record of them for next year, but I hope I can offer some help to people still struggling through this year's challenge too.
Keeping up with New Year’s resolutions is supposed to be bonkers but I’m trying my damn best. The first quarter of the year has come and gone (did you notice?) and I figured it might be a good time to assess this year’s 365 1/2 days project or the 10 things I’ve never done before list.
Here is the exterior of the house - it is a cute little Cape Cod style house in Concord, Ma. I have a lot of projects planned for the inside and outside of the house - wreath on the front door, flower boxes under the windows, urns on the front steps, etc... stay tuned.
On a personal note, while I'm not necessarily ready to jump into another serious relationship, it has been lovely to be treated like this. Perhaps it's just the physical manifestation of the romance that I was trying to be open to. Regardless, I'm learning to be open to this as well as more romance every day.
It must smell absolutely amazing to be right in the middle of it all!
The word ‘Mamak” came up again at the Penang Speakers Square last Sunday. A regular, Uncle Alfred lamented that his fellow Malaysians have forgotten their roots.
Who is he? Well, he's the screen alter-ego of NY filmmaker Justin Fornal. What is he? That's a much harder question to answer. Equal parts pimp, vampire, Anthony Bourdain, Kid Rock and William Shatner. He hosts a cooking/travel show called Bronx Flavor on local public-access television. A "quaffer of culinary consciousness" as he likes to say. It's kind of like "No Reservations", but with much shittier production values, campy bits and the Baron's odd and over-the-top voice-over.
Mo Rocca on covers The New Yorker did not use. Feb. 1925 debut issue. Sol Steiberg's view of the world from NYC. Now, covers which are political and provocative. Current cover editor (FRANÇOISE Mouly) has done over 950 covers. Christoph Niemann (New Yorker is olympics of covers). David Remnick is editor. For us, it's what we like. Push the boundary to see where the boundary can be. Book: Blown covers. Remnick: spoke of unwashed masses not seeing Obama as patriotic. Harry Bliss.
The cable lists five "foreign policy mistakes" Rudd committed since coming to office in 2007. Australian newspapers have focused more on this cable's calling Rudd a "control freak" but the expression is attributed in the cable to "senior civil servants, journalists and parliamentarians". McCallum appears to be merely reporting what others have said. Rudd's weak point was in foreign policy. This combined with the Iraq withdrawal and the emergence of the threat of WikiLeaks, to spark moves by the US for regime change in Australia. A 13 June 2008 cable released by WikiLeaks illustrates US awareness of its influence:
Matt Smith recently veered off-piste to play Christopher Isherwood in a BBC Two drama, to much acclaim. Gillan will shortly play Jean Shrimpton for the BBC Four film We’ll Take Manhattan about the 1960s style icon’s first encounter with David Bailey, at a Vogue photo-shoot in New York. Miniskirts and it-girls? It’s not very Robin Williams, but if anyone can pull it off Karen Gillan can. Those character parts may have to wait.”
We sat outside and enjoyed lunch in 84 degree, cloudless weather.
Early on in my pregnancy, before I officially knew I was having a girl, I was laying in bed completely exhausted and had this vision of exactly what her blessing dress would look like. It was so specific and detailed I thought it would be nearly impossible to find just what I was looking for. So, in my temporary insanity I decided it would be so special to make her dress. Seriously?! I love the decisions that seem so sane in the moment, but when you look back on them you scream at yourself, "What were you thinking?!"
Author: Robert Louis Stevenson
34. Even with mud on my nose, I don't get invited to play many reindeer games, do you?
Egypt is such a loose term; who or what am I referring to when I utter that name? It seems to be like those things you know through and through, and yet, it lies beyond your ability to mould into words..to delineate.
When Zinyemba heard this he returned to his home. The next day he called some of the people and his son-in-laws and went to the vaRozvi. They slept on the way. The following day while roasting some mealies in the fire, a spark jumped out and burned the tyrt of Zinyemba. Zinyemba became sick and died on the way and his people carried his body back and buried him in the country of Nhohwe.
I have also been made aware of attempts by Labour supporters to muscle in on other local groups in attempts to make them take a pro-Labour stance in the run-up to the elections.
When we finished Alice's Adventures in Wonderland we moved on Alice Through The Looking Glass. Chess pieces feature prominently in the story so I pulled out our chessboard and we reviewed how to play it. Playing chess with children is interesting because my goal is not to win but to teach them how to play. It feels weird throwing my chess pieces into positions from which the children can needlessly slaughter them. I talk outloud to myself while playing chess with them to demonstrate how I decide to make my moves. Over the next few days I want to play chess more with each of them, but I also want to have at least one game where as we move the pieces we make up an Alice-like story, about where the creatures are moving and what they are doing. I'm trying also to think about how to draw out or play with a chess board shaped differently, or perhaps to play on a board that morphs into different shapes (hexagons instead of squares, perhaps?).
With war and war’s expression.
Yes. TWICE did my agency place two spaces between words, instead of the requisite one. And this, my friends, means I've hit THE FUCK-UP JACKPOT!
This works in the read-aloud story "The Little Red Hen" because it propels the story and listeners get caught up in the rhythm. But as the great theologian Paul wrote, "Now that I have become a man, I've put an end to childish things" (1 Corinthians 13:11b CEB).
I hope that at least as far as nitrogen compounds are concerned, that nature isn’t present in our tanks and that it is difficult to recreate the necessary conditions in our tanks. Keep in mind that many of you (like myself) really like Amazon species. The amazon has a flow rate of 7 million cubic feet (that’s 52 million gallons) of water per SECOND. That’s why they don’t have any trouble with nitrogen build up. The river is constantly having the biggest water change in the world.
He went to get his ticket. It was a more complicated affair than it had to be, owing to the whims and peculiarities of how Jim Crow played out in a particular town or establishment. For a time, there was a single ticket agent working both booths--the window for the colored and the one for the white. The agent swiveled between the two openings to sell the movie tickets, a roll to the white line and then a pivot to the colored. It created unnecessary confusion and waiting time for one line or the other, the waiting borne more likely by the colored moviegoers than the white, as waiting to be served after colored people would have been unacceptable to the white clientele. By the time Pershing was nearly grown, the swiveling ticket agent was dispensed with in favor of altogether separate windows and ticket sellers, which would cost a little more but would move the white and colored lines along more quickly and more in keeping with the usual protocols of Jim Crow.
It’s been over two years since 10,000 trees were axed for the Rs 400-crore expressway on the southern bypass along Sidhwan Canal in Ludhiana. But, Punjab has so far not provided any land to compensate for the ecological loss through afforestation.
The new agnostic finds trouble with this notion. If the being we call “God” is dead then He/she/It was finite (not infinite or eternal) like us and there would again have to be something attributed to His/Her/Its creation (i.e. an infinite factor/principle/being in all of this that created). As Thomas Aquinas said, “an uncaused cause.” Also, if this being is impersonal, then there would have never been a reason to create, and in fact, no motivation=no creation period. The existence of creation proclaims both an act of love and the personal nature of this being. Why do parents have children? To have someone to love and fellowship with. Now, extend this example to our understanding of our own existence. In short, creation not only requires but demands something that is infinite: a finite God needs and infinite cause too, finite care (an uncaring god) would never have created anything, finite knowledge describes our own current understanding without the presence of special revelation (God revealing Himself to particular persons, in particular times and places). God seems to be the only subject in which we entertain the idea that either nothing has been revealed or there is no way of knowing anything. To claim nothing has been revealed, is to then also propose that all knowledge is known; this is both a self-defeating and lazy notion. It is easier to say little has been revealed or can be understood than nothing at all. And, if little is understood, then does that not mean that some of it is understandable and because of this more can be understood? Why would this divine being create without providing framework or knowledge to then follow in this creative act? Is not every creative act expressing design or intelligence followed by reasonable meaning and purpose? Why do we assume that less can be expected from God? In doing so we’re essentially saying that our experience outweighs revelation (God’s declaration of His own existence).
Miss’s explanation for this was that it was to round out and press home the fact that Mr Duffy was a bit of a weirdo. I mean, it’s clearly a very bizarre practice. What kind of a strange potato must he have been to do that sort of thing?
with a wee bit shaved off one side.
I love recipes that you can throw together in no time at all! That's how this recipe is today - quick, easy, and yummy. My whole family loves this one!
And smile as I have saw her ‘fore she putt her mournin’ on.
Three young men photographed in South Africa's West Cape last Monday, moments before their agonizing deaths. The men were accused of theft and were beaten and stoned before rubber tires were placed round their necks, further tires were placed on top of them and then set alight.
If we were to give the asker the benefit of the doubt and look on a brighter side, we would say he probably has a gift of making connections of ideas in the scriptures. And we think he would make a good mystic if he could choose to focus on extracting the symbolic meanings of parables and allegories to expound on Grace and Unconditional Love. It is a pity that his current mindset is influenced by the Evangelicals doctrines on sin and judgment, as we have seen how he tried to explain “God is love but God is also holy”, blah blah blah.
Regardless of why you are here in blog world; you rock, you matter and you will be forever in my heart.
In between my own bites, I notice he has consumed little of his own.
“When you have a large crowd comprising agitated people and the FRU, what do you think is going to happen? The outcome was inevitable,” he said.
Ever since their debut album Remission, Mastodon's sound has been steadily evolving from the heavy old-school metal of that debut towards an increasingly complex, proggy and melodic sound. They've become more accessible without compromising their intensity in the least, ratcheting up the technical and structural complexity of their music even as their melodies have become more forceful, their guitar leads more harmonic, the vocal balance between guttural howls and layered harmonies tipping more and more toward the latter. The Hunter, their fifth album, continues that evolution, delivering one compact, punchy metal assault after another: they manage to condense prog metal bombast into three-minute radio-ready song lengths, complete with choruses that are both melodically direct and immensely satisfying. It's by far their most accessible and straightforward album, even poppy at times — they even paraphrase the Beatles on the swampy, psychedelic title track — but that doesn't mean it's a betrayal. The band's manic virtuosity doesn't seem the least bit constrained by the shorter track lengths or emphasis on melodicism. Instead, they've simply focused their talents to make one of the best mainstream rock albums in recent memory. [buy]
In other words, I miss my friends.
A go-to brand for easy, oven-ready noodles and lasagna "filling" options is Barilla. We have been loyal to their lasagne noodles, and their basic interpretation of lasagne, for years (shhh...don't tell Nonna!!)
Besides bringing warmer weather, spring will allow me to bring lots of potted plants out. I hope to use the porch for entertaining and will have lots of room for serving snacks and beverages.
I wonder how, after two months of this lifestyle, my new habits are going to fit back into my old life when I get home…
I couldn't believe this was happening after such a great session in the morning. When I got to school, I braced myself for the inevitable - complaints from the teachers. According to the clerk, Alden threw his food on the floor, cried loudly, took all the books from the book shelves and threw them all over the classroom. She said Alden was being 'impossible'. As a mother, it wasn't easy for me to digest all this. Makes one feel like a failure you know.
Dr. Michael
Of course, nothing remotely like that is going to happen under this president.
UPDATE 4/27: I have yet to see a single interface whiner stop using Blogger, by the way. (Or Facebook, for that matter.) You'd think someone was asking people to learn to fly the Space Shuttle.
Lord I am getting old and grumpy.
Brutal, just brutal.
Upon further questioning, by the authorities, the appellant made other statements concerning the details of the offense. The appellant stated that while T.R. was standing on the victim’s throat, he placed his hands on the appellant for balance. He further indicated that, when they dumped the victim’s clothes over the cliff, T.R. took some of the clothing and Kenny took a ring from the victim. The appellant indicated that he took nothing from her. The appellant was then asked why he and his accomplices had killed the victim; the appellant responded that he did not know why they had killed her, “but it was not his problem.” The officer who took the appellant’s statement noted that he was very cooperative and that his attitude was “almost one of humor. He had a smile during the entire time we were speaking with him.”
Tomorrow (May 1st) is our Special Olympics. I am so excited… it feels like Christmas! I am a big ol’ emotional baby when it comes to stuff like this. I will have my camera and will be taking loads of pictures of all the Olympians. I am hoping to post some pics (generalized un-labeled pictures) for you all to see.
From what I’ve heard and could tell, they decided to end the anime this way because they wanted to appease the female market of this brand, which was surprisingly strong for this type of anime (shonen, martial arts) but the female fans did love their Kenshin anime and the anime ending held smack down with a romantic ending that would’ve pleased them. (Surprisingly, there wasn’t a big backlash with the ending)
Yes??!
Just realised this morning I hadn't updated my stitching earlier in the week.
a crone, a nobody
And never stops at all,
4:00 getting ready for work with help from my little stylist... she too is getting ready for what I am not sure?
6.) Orthodoxy Today - Just as I included my caveat for my Roman Catholic brothers and sisters above, I should say once again that, as a Protestant, I don’t agree with everything here either. But their commitment to the historic Christian faith and the impact that it ought to have for every sphere of life is unquestionable. Always good things to read.
So, I didn’t think this was possible, but today, I live streamed episode 2 of Dream High 2 and there were English captions! That’s awesome, right?
Sobe bronzer - summer fling (applied to cheek bones and blending back toward the hair line)
on theology they would subsist
Princess Poppyseed’s life on her family’s farm is far from the glamorous but lonely world of her favorite pop singer Vanna Banana. On a chance meeting at a playground, Vanna and Princess cross paths and realize that they look almost exactly alike—which leads to the crazy secret plan where they decide to switch lives! As each girl realizes that the life they longed for doesn’t fulfill all of their dreams, they learn that the life God gave them is the one for which they were uniquely and lovingly designed.
556 D-VI/6/1965. “The Songs of Socrates: On Plato’s Phaedo.” Basic Program Graduation, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois.
Here's a brief sample:
“I will never back down. I will never take it back and I will never apologise,” he added.
4. A pedicure. The luxurious hour I am fortunate enough to enjoy every month to keep my feet in beautiful walking condition.
Little fish rain down from the sky.
4) Let the dough rise, covered, for 1 hour.
Designed for city cars, the Touring tyre provides precise steering and control whilst offering optimum driving control.
Oldest wanted to explore tobymac.com Together, we became a fan on Facebook and posted on his wall -- something I would never do. Middleson wanted to check out fbi.gov. After looking at America's Most Wanted, he was sure he recognized one of the men. I see dollar signs as I type! REWARD!
* Find a formula that works best for you and your family - there is no one size fits all approach to anything in life. Do whatever approach works the best for you!
His death was a result of a series of curses which he received in his life. Those curses were due to the misjudgment of the ones giving them. It was also due to his mother who did not care about her eldest son but was content with her 3 sons and 2 step-sons, though she came to plead to him before the day he was suppose to fight Arjun to not fight,but Karna said it was too late for her to recognize him as her son.It was also result of his giving up of his body Armour and earning with which he was born to Lord Indra who came disguised as a poor Brahmin. Karna use to pray to Sun God at every noon and he was famous for giving away anything that some asked from him at that time even if it may lead to his death. Indra capitalized on that nobility of karna and asked for his armour to save his son. Indra, shamed into generosity by Karna’s gesture, reciprocated by giving Karna the boon to use his most powerful weapon, the Vasavi shakti, but only once. It was then that Karna earned the name Vaikartana, as he cut the armour off his body without flinching.
Sorry we are behind on the last few challenges we are having summer brain which means we are playing with the kiddos and are easily distracted..
“We are honored to have been selected for the Jefferson Award,” said SMSC Vice-Chairman Glynn A. Crooks. “Part of who we are as Dakota people is to help others.”
barbecue
Treat yourself to something special and enjoy the moment.
The Bionic Bean is getting breathing treatments every two hours and she is still on several antibiotics and a host of different medications, just about enough to start a small drug dealership. She is off the heavy-duty sedatives, which is causing some withdrawal symptoms, but nothing Trainspotting-like. She still needs medication for the pain left behind by the breathing tube and the surgery, and she has some wheezing and stridor due to the swelling in her trachea. Her breathing sounded Darth Vaderesque this morning but by now it turned into more of a squeaky door sound.
My head thought to itself
even if you haven't met them yet
This is a quick one, folks. I eating breakfast and thinking (two things at the same time, so you know I exhausted) and start to ask myself why in all of this TV6 not liable in any way….and anyone with an answer feel free to respond and clarify.
I called and called all over and waited weeks to hear something or find Sock, and as each day would come and go, more tears would as well. Parker seemed to be finding his way to our room every night and everything seemed off... Who knew an animal could really have such an impact on a little one? I finally broke down and had another one delivered...
Maybe it’s time to wear that outfit I’ve saved, or to use the crystal or china that’s been sitting in the cupboard for years gathering dust. Maybe it’s time to stop looking at the past, and letting it overwhelm me. Time to realize and accept that I’m never NOT going to be sad about it. Being sad is a normal reaction to terrible events. It’s time to make peace with it, to realize it’s never going to go away, and for lack of a better term, acknowledge that it walks along with me whether I like it or not. Acceptance.
To return to Mr Purcell, I'm fairly irritated by the faux piety on display re the 'chemical dependency' rumours. Virtually everyone in politics is a rotten hypocrite on the subject of drugs not always by inclination but because if they were remotely honest about it the tabloids would rip them to bits, cheered on by a drink/drunk addled public who would do well to pay close attention to this poem by Burns before casting stones around their conservatories. I should also point out to my fellow Labour haters of all stripes that when the shoe is on the other foot and it will be, you'll all be squealing like Violet Elizabeth Bott about the unfairness of it all. Will you be happy to have your sneering and grinning cast up when it's your guy or girl in the firing line?
As Christians we must seek, search and know if the institution we are adhering to is preaching a different gospel. We can only determine whether or not an individual has accepted the Truth into their life by the belief system they adhere to. Just as we can be certain that any institution that does not profess Jesus Christ is the only Truth, the only Way and the only Life is not Christian, we can be certain that the individual in question has not yet found Truth.
I guess Bordick didn’t think much of the Mets anyway – the second he was a free agent (right after the 2000 season), he bolted back to Baltimore (where they hadn’t won anything in several years).
Gillette Fusion $9
Ps: The most amusing part of writing this post was in trying to come up with a title. Amongst the many discarded gems were: “There’s a veritable conflagration in my pants” and “Could my pants BE any more fiery?” … but then I realised that it just sounded like an advert for thrush cream or an unfortunate venereal disease.
Sybil looked at the witch. “Did you do something?”
I know some of it has to do with “The Brain.” He has a visit coming soon to talk about funeral arrangements. Overall, he’s feeling good after recovering from his pneumonia, but the decline is still there. Then again, he might plateau again, which his nurse today mentioned as something for which he’s due. The good thing is that this last illness is getting him to talk about needing more help and making future arrangements.
Anyway, shy of it or proud of it, the truth is that Indian Astrology is a conglomerate composite of classical global astrological culture mixed with its ancient original roots. No doubt, ancient Indian astrology was very highly developed, but again there is no doubt that it was quite unlike the sign-and-house based system Vedic astrologers and Jyotishis use so heavily today.
GROSS: I lost about 100
University of Michigan, Ann Arbor, MI
Serena Williams
But Chafee says far from perfect. The animals were swarming her for food and she says it even gets worse.
‘Peace I leave with you; my peace I give you. I do not give to you as the world gives. Do not let your hearts be troubled and do not be afraid.’
Summer is a traditional time for reading at the beach or just the back porch and there is a surfeit of novels for those who enjoy fiction.
The willingness to be receptive to, and to acknowledge, the good will of others (exhibited during his Privacy Commission chairmanship) has been evident as well in discussion I have heard Bernard Weisberg conduct with law students about the workings of the Illinois Constitutional Convention in which he served. He can always be counted upon to give those who differed from him their due, humanely trying to appreciate the merits of their positions, even as he has been a tough and able advocate of his own. He has been zealous in discouraging the facile opinion, all too common today among politicians, lawyers and would-be lawyers (as well as among intellectuals)—the crippling, if not corrupting, opinion that men are moved ultimately by their self-interest, narrowly conceived. His principled openmindedness means that he can always be counted upon to approach controversies from a fresh perspective, even when he defers to the old way. All this is enlivened by a sense of humor very much informed by a bemused awareness of the odd corners of human life. It is certainly difficult to imagine anyone as humane as he is providing, as all too many respectable lawyers do provide, legal services to prosperous scoundrels, year in and year out, without ever attempting to change the ways of such clients for the better.
I knew her, I loved her, I was blessed. So was she.
My card today uses a stamp from Stampavie, it’s called Tickles. I cut out the middle portion of the front of my card and inserted a piece of acetate instead so that the sentiment can be seen from the outside of my card.
I'm tired of being told how bad America is by left-wing millionaires like Michael Moore, George Soros and Hollywood Entertainers who live in luxury because of the opportunities America offers. In thirty years, if they get their way, the United States will have the economy of Zimbabwe, the freedom of the press of China, the crime and violence of Mexico, the tolerance for Christian people of Iran, and the freedom of speech of Venezuela.
Ooh yes this. DING. Yes yes yes. This is what I will teach my son. :) My school doesn't do religious instruction at ALL thankfully, and I feel it's a parent's job to do this when the child is ready. Gabe will most likely attend Yule with me this year for the first time and I hope it's special for him. I've resisted doing anything before this because he's too young to understand. Now that he's four (four already?!) he can grasp the concepts at least a little.
From dough ball, pull a ping-pong ball sized piece. Shape and roll about an 1" thick disc between plastic wrap. Fill carefully with about Tablespoon of filling mixture. Fold over to one side to cover filling and seal. This should take on a crescent moon shape.
Join in online!
I still have to fix up the sand to match the rest of the piece. Right now the orange is still shinning through quite a bit and is causing the paint to look gray. Ideally, I’d like it to be brighter. I guess we’ll see what happens!
Reading, Writing and Waiting is excited to be part of Jennifer Jabaley's CRUSH CONTROL blog tour!
The skin has thinned
We invited Michelle, Aliyah, and Hailey to come with us. We bundled the kids and ourselves up and got to see some really cool birds. The weather wasn't too bad but by the end of it all of us were getting a bit cold. The kids had a lot of fun running around and seeing all of the birds and playing together. I was glad that I was able to use the coupon and do something fun with the kids.
Try it, if you want to!
The account in the Babylonian Talmud is much longer, double the length, introduced with the information that R. Yehudah HaNasi was ill, and therefore the scholars declared a fast “to ask for mercy,” while in the same time stating that everyone telling of his death, will be “stabbed with a sword”. It further adds an account of R. Yehudah haNasi’s maidservant going to the roof, stating that the “ones above and the “ones below” are asking for him, and that may it be the will of God to listen to the ones below, but when seeing how he suffers, she asks that the “ones above” may win, so he would be relieved from his sufferings. From there we jump to the Sages, who were continuous praying for his recovering, which – understood from the context – would be them engaged in the struggle to keep him alive, making them the “ones below,” until a vessel certainly was taken up and dropped, disturbing them enough to interfere their prayer, and letting R. Yehudah HaNasi give up his breath. They then send Bar Qappara to investigate his state, who finds out that he had died, and then we return to the account of Bar Qappara giving news of his death, still with the difference that here he turned his cloak around so it would not appear what had happened. Also in this account we are not told how they react from the news, ending with Bar Qappara’s indirect answer.
I love honoring and celebrating their milestones. Thanks for being a good little example to me, Shauna, on lots of creative ways to celebrate our kids.
Don House, a lay delegate from Texas, warned the UMC against setting an unwelcome precedent. “We’d be targeting the companies that make the products, instead of the people who use the products,” he argued on Wednesday.
Quirk, anti-jerk, surf wave Texas desert dessert. Hanging 10 from Austin, they released their classic 7" in 1979 amidst the seas of the new wave social rumblings. They also released a record with Lester Bangs in 1980.
** loaves are done when you press on top and it feels firm and the loaves spring back.
I also have my folder full of 'torn out' recipes and my Nanna's favourite recipes she hand wrote in an exercise book which are also my favourites plus a few others but the above 5 are on the top of my list. Why not check out everyone elses favourites over at Kate Takes 5. Check for Amazon promotional codes for cookbooks and find your favorite.
These preservatives are sometimes added to soda to prevent mold from growing, but benzene is a known carcinogen that is also linked with serious thyroid damage. Dangerous levels of benzene can build up when plastic bottles of soda are exposed to heat or when the preservatives are combined with ascorbic acid (vitamin C). Don’t risk it, people
I shall be seeing a lot more of the Long Man in the future. I think we're going to get along very well.
I'm still consolidating the Secret Antiquities material into the Society of Torch, Pole and Rope. This first appeared on October 23rd, 2010.
We all have a favorite pen. People always have a pen that feels good to write with and is comfortable to hold and they like the results.
14.) Focus - Hocus Pocus - A ferocious riff, it dropped down because of the yodeling.
I thought the following Brisbane event might interest the romance writers and novelists out there.
Make sure you visit your own local Irish cultural club or center, there’s a home there for anyone with a Celtic soul and plenty of rewarding work if you’d like to volunteer your services.
have had our biannual migration talks and we have talked — we have
Heat the olive oil in a large skillet over medium heat. Add the diced bacon and onion and cook until golden brown, about 10 minutes. Add the garlic and cook a minute until fragrant. Remove bacon, onion and garlic with a slotted spoon and set aside for a few minutes to cool.
Gio is roughly 19.5" at the shoulder. Romeo is about 14" at the shoulder.
My students have loved using iPads at Emerson School. Our library is open every morning recess and we have two iPads for small groups to use. Students read picture book apps, explore nonfiction book apps, and play math games to practice basic math facts. Today I shared some of our experiences with colleagues at our quarterly Bay Area Independent School Librarians meeting.
Have a lovely weekend and I should have a few more piccies of my garden soon. Slowly getting there and I am starting to see the transformation.
But there was a time when this character was given a more fitting label. Fribbler. He was the foolish fiend that fathers warned their fangasts about. He was a trifler, a flirt, a man who expressed profound infatuation or rapture for a woman with no intention of committing himself to her, who in fact dreaded the woman’s consent.
I’m over at iheartpresents at the moment, and if you’ve nipped over here from there you might be looking for this post in which I pondered the serious matter of hero material for Powerful Italian Penniless Housekeeper. (I probably should point out that in the end MPW didn’t get the job.)
A win for Owen Coyle’s Bolton side will surely see Blackburn relegated, while Spurs will be looking to build on their solid performance against said Blackburn with another win tonight.
Posted by The Uhuru Guru
Time can stop him.
It has however provided the opportunity to write this blog update at last - September has been an extraordinary month for me and of course a number of others, I owe it to capture something before the month ends.
In the role of Nightwing is Neil Patrick Harris who perfectly captures the light-hearted charisma and sharp wit of Batman’s original protégé. How the story portrays Dick Grayson is fantastic. Dick & Bruce work in tandem battling foes with grace and efficiency. They finish each other’s thoughts, both thinking the same amount of steps ahead to swing in at the right time for the save. I’ve always enjoyed Nightwing as a character full of potential. Here, he’s mainly involved in just the action sequences, but he makes them so much more dynamic with his acrobatics and sense of fun in the face of danger. I am wholehearted believer in the unlimited potential of Nightwing and Dick Grayson. By trusted accounts, he made for a wonderful Batman following the “Battle for the Cowl” comic story arc.
A website creates a first impression on client or person browsing it. By undertaking rich site designs offered by professional Web Design India Company it becomes possible for business entities to set up unique distinctive image for their business on internet. These experts offer sites that are inclusive of additional superior elements such as Photoshop, MySQL, CMS, Zend framework, adobe illustrator and more. Sites can be obtained by software development India firms for small as well as large scale business firms. Support services can also be obtained by them for gaining better targeted audience rate for services and products being offered.
Yet these are the terrorists whom men like Andy Young support.
How’s that for a radical approach to childrearing? ”Give your kids some freedom, give them some hugs, and don’t worry so much about the perfect smothering/mothering ratio. The end.”
Blow blow
But why, you are wondering, is Evel Knievel of such import to me?
Well folks, that’s it … time to head over to Lucia’s for some soup and a minicupcake….
"Curiouser and curiouser!"
Joel made a interesting observation when he and I were chatting at breakfast the next morning. He commented that this was an easy transition as the trust has already been established and as well the knowledge of each other that takes so long when developing a friendship. We so easily slipped into comfortable talk and easy companionship.
10. There's a love plot involving a half-reptile/half-man and Heather Menzies.
Now that Halloween is over, we get to see all the wonderful photos that go with that festive holiday. So many great scrapbook pages are made for Halloween and Fall. The colors are warm and wonderful and oh those pumpkins.
Yes, some of it.
Jane works on a wide range of films and television projects. If you’ve watched the popular series “The Tudors”, you’ve heard the many different sound of horses’ hooves she recorded herself north of Toronto. A quiet, calm, thoughtful woman, she travels the world with her microphone, capturing everything from the sound of nightingales to the noise of a car’s handbrake. She’s a gentle obsessive — with an entire wall and case of trophies and awards for her and her company’s work.
The recipe is simplicity itself. While slicing the cabbage and onion and apple you let the sausages brown in the pressure cooker. I´m usually too lazy to brown, but in this instance it´s pretty painless. By the time everything is prepped, the bangers are golden and smelling a treat.
You have to figure out what you can sew together and what will have to be taped or glued together. I didn't want anyone tripping so I sewed a lot of this t and then rolled it up as I went along. The big long lengths of picnic table fabric were then laid out and taped down. We used a lot of double sided carpet tape for this.And Discount Fabrics gave me a great deal because I ordered mega yards of this red and white stuff..
...to have no activities planned for our trip this weekend. The goal is to relax!
Nevertheless, it isn’t possible to conclude that these BATA arguments are without any prospect of success. As I remarked at the outset, it seems to me that BATA’s case is quite a reasonable one (legally as opposed to morally), although on balance I still expect that it will more than likely fail.
Mix all the ingredients thoroughly and store in a plastic container with a lid. Use two tablespoons per wash. The powder will not make suds. For a very heavily stained load of washing or tradesperson’s clothes, if you have a top loader let it fill with water and start working, then turn the machine off when the powder is dissolved. In a front loader, operate the machine to dissolve the powder and then stop the machine for an hour to soak the clothes. Leave to soak for an hour, or overnight, and then turn the machine on and continue washing as normal.
2:30 Raffle Drawings Begin-Must be present to win
What this article did however was spark a conversation between my wife and I regarding Graffiti and art. Surprisingly we agreed that in the main genuine graffiti inspired art was in fact worthy of public display and as valid as cubism, Pollock’s Blue Poles that hangs in the National Gallery or any other art style that over the years has inspired debate. Now one of the glaringly obvious differences’ is that the art (graffiti) is applied to public and private buildings etc often without permission, the other of course is the tagging etc that is included in the genre. To me this is just defacing something that doesn’t belong to the tagger for reasons that seem a little akin to a male cat spraying to mark its territory.
Still I notice You when change begins
Eventually, William's time is up.
Cox lays the wood on Romo.
Colin Davis hunched over his notebook and tried to think of a word that meant the same thing as “hairy.” He’d already used “hirsute” a couple of times and he needed to emphasize his monster’s increasing… hairiness. Chewing his pencil didn’t help. Neither did the chattering of the abundant crowd at Pizza Haven and, most unhelpful of all, the nearness of Tanya Dougherty, waitress and Goddess of Beauty, who was leaning over, resting her elbows on a table just in front of him, charming the college guys with her low-cut front and knocking his concentration into a ditch with the perky round perfection of her tartan-miniskirt-clad behind.
Hope you having a happier Wednesday than me lovelies! xxx
Thanks for looking!
The concerns about the possible contamination of UK groundwater come from the essential part of the process called hydraulic fracturing, which in combination with the horizontal drilling techniques pioneered in the US, is an essential part of the shale gas production process.
With my son’s birthday this month, I have been in a party planning mood. I thought I’d take the time this week to share a couple of the birthday parties we have done for him. I am a simple, frugal person so you’ll find most of these ideas are not extravagant!
I used SCS Sketch for the week - I loved it, so simple and fun. I used some sparkly fun flock on the collar and cuffs of Kaela's outfit. And the wings and stars are covered in Prisma glitter.
It takes a lot to politicise the English. Indeed it was only through the imminent threat of Islam that I became politicised; as is the case with many other members of the EDL. I was never a William-Hague type who decided on politics, not matter what, at the tender age of eleven or whatever. The EDL is not made up of political careerists. Its members are not playing politics either, as so many students tend to do. The reality of the threat of Islam has politicised many EDL, even if many of us were otherwise apolitical - or even anti-political - before.
That I find transphobic comments “offensive” is not the objectionable thing about them. The objectionable thing is that they are oppressive.
The dinosaur side was much more tame with 50 life size creatures, and no robot T-Rex to attack you in the building’s outhouse. I could barely hear my thoughts above the screams and roars in the building, but I knew on my way out that the business owners of the establishment were on to something. Good thing its open all year long.
Living in families help our basic needs. Most people don’t live in isolation — they crave the company of others. This system of living has practical implications, since it’s easier to take care of basic needs working together. Taken further, it can give a sense of why families choose to live in community. We find community with family, circles of friends, school, workplace, religious community, and other gatherings of individuals based on interests we might be drawn to or talents we have. At the end of the day, though, our family of origin is where we learn how to live together, in harmony and sometimes not. The roles we live out in our family are what we grow up and we find normal. We all know from staying over with a friend or when we take get married, that every family is different. As adults, we might reflect on our family roles later and be surprised that there are patterns of behavior that seemed “normal” that perhaps we did not notice or took for granted as “how the world works.”
But right now, it ALL seems to be happening.
In our personal lives, social networks play an ever-increasing and entrenched role in our daily lives. Speaking from my personal experience, I spent 18 months “off” of facebook, a period of time which coincided, coincidentally and not by design, with the period of time during which facebook was struggling with privacy issues. I am back “on” now, but 80% of my activity would be considered lurking. I do not like to post anything, and I only comment to specific people. During those 18 months, I was very much “out of the loop” with my friends. Daily, conversations at our lunch group would involve references to something on facebook, something about which I was not privy due to my abstinence. During those 18 months, I was on one end of what boyd (2007, p. 3) refers to as a participatory divide. Having experienced the ostracism caused by my lack of connectedness, I can imagine the severity of this exclusion for teens who are still “developing a social identity” (boyd, 2007, p. 21).
As a kid, one of my favourite radio programmes was Desert Island Discs, a BBC Radio 4 production that has been running since 1942. The basic format is that a well-known guest is invited onto the show and asked to imagine that they will be stranded for an indefinite period on a desert island with 8 pieces of music, one book of their choice, The Complete Works of Shakespeare, the Bible or other relevant religious/philosophical work and one luxury item which must be inanimate and of no use to escaping from the island. In between explaining their music choices, the guests talk about their lives and since this programme is basically an institution, they've had just about everyone you can think of on there. Imagine my delight, then, when I found out that I could subscribe to the podcasts of current episodes AND access the archives all the way back to 1998.
* Financial pressure
At least, I could do all that if it was light out.
- Whipped cream would make a nice companion to this cake/dessert.
Critics on both the left and right assailed this sneak attack on our Constitutional rights.
There are a lot of ways to prepare a clafoutis, the tastiest ones including the addition of cream. For the one I made last week, skim milk was what I used in an attempt to pretend like I'm "watching what I eat". "Attempt". Although skim milk isn't cream, surely, it makes for a darn good clafoutis.
Middle school kids are experimenting with who they want to be, trying on different roles and identities for size, and attempting to “find” themselves. What character will they be in the story of life?
04-Four Until Late
+ Congos - Heart of the Congos - 1977
There are also several modern historians who have written interesting studies on particular aspects of Islamic history – Wadad al-Qadi at Chicago has written several articles about political authority in early Islam (which, unfortunately, are pretty much only available if you can access JSTOR or the like); Amin Maalouf wrote a fascinating history of the Crusades from the native, Middle Eastern perspective called Crusades through Arab Eyes; and A. A. Sachedina’s The Just Ruler is interesting both for his account of the development of early Shi’i thought, as well as a historical source itself, as it was written in the glow of the Iranian revolution.
So I go to my favorite source, Google, and found that many other women were having the same problems I was with the template. I contacted the designer, and she responded that the instructions that come with the template are all there are, but she did give me one very helpful hint that I will relay in a minute. Once I figured out how to make the quilt, it was simple and I just love making these now. I see a Christmas table runner in my future.
When choosing a school for Rachel I wanted to send her to our local church school. It seemed like a church school would match best with our family values. There was one major down point however, it would mean driving her to school because it was too far to walk. So we also short listed our local catchment school which we could walk to.
8950-163 Street
Post-Zionist Israel’s strength, he suggested, now lies in its normalcy, its rejection of ideology in favor of a middle class resilience that stands up to terror not so much with war as with daring to get on with living.
The second beer was another long standing favourite of mine. It's Harviestoun's Schiehallion and as Pete Brown said in introducing the beer, "It proves that lager can be just as good as an ale". Some discussion followed as to whether it is a lager or a pale ale. It's a lager due to it's method of production but it ultimately doesn't matter. You can call it what you want. I call it a bloody nice beer.
It is certainly true that we know a lot more about people as individuals then ever before. In fact, we know a frightening amount. It is also true that we have the ability to serve ads based on what we know about individual behaviors, attitudes, demographics, and finances. Yes, we have the technology.
The less you handle the meat, and the less you pack it, the more tender the meatballs will be. I use the scoop above, and handle the meat as little as possible when rolling it into balls, which means the meatballs aren't always perfectly round. The small size of the meatballs makes it easy to roll them without handling them too much.
The position pays Rs 25,000 per month. Apart from this, there are other projects which are paid as per the terms of that project/funding available. The Fellow is expected to be present in Kolkata during the tenure of the Fellowship (barring weekends and regular holidays etc). However, if the Fellow can be in Kolkata only at intermittent intervals, we can certainly try and work out a suitable arrangement.
I've only read this study's abstract, and clearly this research only looks at a small area of the U.S., but it's interesting in light of the fact that cesarean rates are highest among the privately insured, which has led to concerns about physicians' motives.
In the meantime, the sun was passing above the hilltops, and so they decided they had wasted enough of the morning already and that it was high time to leave the old ‘Gray Serpent’ cave and head out. The going was rough, slow and dangerous, as they made their way over the Jagged Hills through the deep snowdrifts. There were occasional drop offs into dark ravines, and yawning crevasses but no one slipped and so eventually they came to the other side of the hills where the road was.
In the night-time, it's the right time
Tender chicken with spinach leaves, mushrooms, and Romano cheese. Very nice.
pinch cayenne
I also had a bit of fun playing with this vintage photo of the lady in the birdcage. I gave her a sparkly crown and named her the Flea Market Queen.
I no longer call you slaves,
Once David and his wife passed away in 1786, his nephew Abel stepped in to raise their nine children. That may seem crazy now but back then it was quite normal. Around 1827, Abel K. Conklin, Abel’s son, inherited the house after his father’s death and made a second story addition to raise his family. He later became the Town Supervisor, Justice of the Peace, Commissioner of Highways, Assessor and Commissioner of Common Schools. Abel was an important and busy member of Huntington society which eventually rubbed off on his son Moreland who served as Executive Chairman of the Committee.
Lo, the flowery month is come! March winds and April showers have done their work, and the earth is all bedecked with beauty. Come my soul, put on thine holiday attire and go forth to gather garlands of heavenly thoughts. Thou knowest whither to betake thyself, for to thee “the beds of spices” are well known, and thou hast so often smelt the perfume of “the sweet flowers,” that thou wilt go at once to thy well-beloved and find all loveliness, all joy in him. That cheek once so rudely smitten with a rod, oft bedewed with tears of sympathy and then defiled with spittle—that cheek as it smiles with mercy is as fragrant aromatic to my heart. Thou didst not hide thy face from shame and spitting, O Lord Jesus, and therefore I will find my dearest delight in praising thee.
In short, we necessarily spend a lot of time on ourselves and thinking about ourselves and our art. Many can get lost internally for long periods while immersed in these thoughts. For those who might not see the importance of this solitary time and these solitary thoughts, it might be easy to think of us as selfish.
Taipei is a really exciting city right now, but it's not just because it has become such an international center. It's partly because Taiwan is developing such a unique identity, and designers and artists are finding so many exciting ways to explore it. While it was awesome being able to see the Gaultier show and browse among Japanese design items, it was even more exciting to find a creative bag by a Taiwanese designer, and to see a local artist's video installation that reflected the island we're living on. So while we may, in a sense, have the world available just a short train trip away, right now I'm even more excited to have Taiwan there too.
If we could get to heaven on our own ability, why did Jesus die????
Context on the show: Lisa is distraught that her role in the upcoming school production will be “curtain puller”. When she objects her teacher responds with the above.
Vincent: One dollar.
Credits: Fonts: Catholic School Girls BB (internet) and Alor (internet); Action: foam stamp by Atomic Cupcake; Papers: Digital Scrapbook Teacher (Summertime kit - polka dot & stripes), Mye DeLeon (AttaBoy kit - blue), Persnickety Prints (Crazy Love papers - blue/green hearts), Polka Dot Pixels (jingle jangle mini kit - green); Accents: Tia Bennett (Dude Totally kit - star/circle), Scraps N Pieces (Penalty Box kit - button)
Did that make me sound tough? ‘Cause that’s what I was going for.
And just like that I'm liking Paryumchiakdan even more! Akhee Ahn revealed that the band used to go by The Infamous Orchestra, but that they prefer the original Korean name. And if you're curious about that psychobilly band he mentioned above, that would be Command 27 where he played the bass.
After entering the store’s broken glass front door, Collier County sheriff’s deputies found an axe inside the office next to a safe that had been covered in wood stainer and shredder oil. A fine, white powder from a fire extinguisher covered the room, and a chainsaw was plugged into an outlet, reports said.
Another parallel to creative copywriting I found in my reading material today (tell me what it is and I'll send you a prize), this time from the world of comedy.
THE HOUSE OF THE DEAD 4 KATE AVATAR – 4/17
Bernice Stegers is a good-looking woman. But Jane? Jane’s insane.
I replaced it with this one from Lowe's. $36 for the fixture and $6 for each seed glass shade. I broke one on the way home so I had to go back and buy another one. So my $54 fixture ended up costing $60. Had I realized 100 years ago when I first hated that light how easy it was to replace, I would have done it years ago. Replacing a light is so simple. A couple of screws, twist a couple of wire nuts and voila - a new beautiful light fixture.
of two separate bodies, one with expertise that is advisory and regulatory and the other adjudicatory’. This brilliant suggestion, in fact, has a dual effect of institutionalizing technical assistance in adjudication and at the same time ensuring judicial independence. Just like the National Litigation Policy 2010, the situation calls for an immediate reassessment of tribunalisation in India and the Government should refocus on formulating a policy rather than prolonging litigation.
Pia and I had difficulty choosing which cake to try. We eventually ended up with one of her favorites, the Best Kept Secret cake, and one new kind, the Pocket Garden cake.
we call the front yard
Enjoy! Can't wait to hear what you think of Lisa's items!
Chris Morgan is an academic and writer and lives in northern NSW.
The Prestonpans Tapestry was unveiled on July 26, 2010. With 104 panels (each a metre long), it was designed by Andrew Crummy and embroidered by over 200 volunteer embroiderers. Some are clearly extraordinarily accomplished embroiders, others were just novices who wanted to be part of this exceptional project: what is clear is that the outcome is quite extraordinary. A national treasure to rival the Bayeau Tapestry! It took the embroiders more than 25,000 hours, making some 10 million stitches, to create the world’s longest embroidered artwork at 104 metres.
It is important that Actors have no shared state. When start() is called, the Actor is started and a START_MESSAGE is sent to execute any afterStart handlers. The send() sends the information to the actor, where the appropriate onMessage() method is invoked. At this time, you would see the debug message displayed on the console and the method returns to the controller.The controller constructs a JSON response and sends it to the client. The debug statement “Completed mining” will be printed a long time later (depending on the time taken to execute the operation).
love,hannan.
Jeff Nolan, Zander Schloss - guitars
So! Four new stamps in the shop today. One coming to you straight per customer request. I truly take all of the ideas you guys give me seriously, so keep 'em coming! I may not make all of them right away, but they go into the old bean to churn around a while, I promise.
In the end, only workers' control of the means of production can prevent the recurrence of such environmental catastrophes in the future. The entire energy industry, including the oil corporations and the Wall Street investors and banks that finance them, must be expropriated without compensation – that is, nationalized under workers control – and defended by a workers' government. In reality, this goal can only be achieved if the working class in the U.S. and around the globe rise up, and get rid of capitalism once and for all through the socialist revolution.
On Saturday night Mr Neville Joseph, his wife and their two friends with two children were attacked on their small holding the rest in Nelspruit. They were having a braai when three armed men stormed on to them, the armed men then spoke to them in afrikaans and English telling them that they will not be harmed,the women were then told to give up their jewellery, Mr Neville Joseph then over heard them talking to one another in Zulu that they were going to first rape the women then kill all of them, luckily Mr Joseph understood their language, Mr Farreira took action and threw one of the attackers with a chair and Mr Joseph also jumped them, they ran around the house then a shot was fired hitting Mr Joseph in his stomach, more shots were then fired but luckily no one was hit! The nearby security heard the shots and the Joseph family also pushed the panic button at this time the attackers fled! Mr Joseph is in hospital and doing ok! His wife is very traumatized but also ok
When faced with two such delicious options as pie and cupcakes...why choose? Instead, let's put them together into one new, completely delicious and tempting sweet treat! I'm so excited about these cupcakes it's not even funny. Seriously. I may not even share them with anyone. Actually, I take that back...I just did the math on how many hours I'd have to spend in the gym and how many calories I'd have to give up over the next few weeks to make up for it. Nevermind. I'll just make the one that I do eat last. :)
Dear friends and fellow writers,
I recognize that those “people” have always been out there but when they would say things to me about his behavior I would defend him or make excuses for him. I am no longer afraid to stand up against him or his actions. He no longer has power over me.
it is what is ‘Here’ ,
This week I also had some really great conversations with some awesome people, who I am tremendously thankful for. It’s so awesome how believers can feel like family so immediately.
And you will not find any organization past or present, religious or nonreligious as regards (Jihad and military) (ordering) the whole nation to march forth and mobilize all of them. into active military service as a single row for Jihad in Allah’s Cause so as to make superior the Word of Allah (i.e. none has the right to be worshipped but Allah), as you will find in the Islamic Religion and its teachings.
Keep this in mind, you can't be good without bad. If there was no bad, good wouldn't be a choice. She has a solid foundation in good, but she's always going to have to choose it, just like the rest of us.
In the 1958 translation by Hayward and Harari the passage reads: “In answer to the challenge of the desolation brought by the death into the life of the small community whose members were slowly pacing after him, he was drawn, as irresistibly as water funneling downwards, to dream, to think, to work out new forms, to create beauty.”
So…..What is Leadership???
Mary Rosenblum
ghee/ oil - 1/2 tsp
How did “Skinny Jeans” and “60-Day” Challenge start? What kind of success have the girls had thus far? For a long time I had wanted to create a program that was achievable, manageable and that clients would see results in a short amount of time. Therefore in May of 2011 I selected two women, sisters actually, Jessica and Jolene to participate in a free 60 day challenge. The program included classes, nutritional guidance, and walking. We documented their results over 60 days and they lost over 22 inches combined- which they have kept off almost one year later! I then launched the 60 day challenge studio wide. Since August I have seen more than 200 inches lost and over 200lbs lost!
This book is therefore darker and more intense than the one before. We are haunted by the cruelty of the Capitol and we see Katniss’ confusion about her role in a larger, grander political scheme. There are also claims of the existence of District 13, but the most important and shocking aspect of this book has to be Haymitch’s duplicity. He lies to both Katniss and Peeta about keeping the other alive, he pretends to not care about Katniss’s claims about a revolution and he sacrifices Peeta’s life. We learn about a plan that has been in motion long before the Quell was announced, and we see the formation of a new order. The next book promises to give us an insightful look into the making of the revolution, and seems to indicate the most explosive ending yet. I can’t wait!
“Ye shall receive power, after the Holy Ghost is come upon you, and ye shall be witnesses unto me both in Jerusalem, and in all Judea, and in Samaria, and unto the uttermost part of the earth.”
Until I give in, and it’s off we go.
During the American Revolution, packet ships remained an important part of intelligence and communication for and in the American colonies. Moving a piece of information from Charleston to Boston by land took several weeks, but by sea, when the winds were favorable, a message could be moved in a few days.
As they share the same dialect and culture as local Chinese, they will have fewer problems integrating into Singapore society as compared to Chinese from far-flung inland provinces who come from a completely alien world altogether.
Eight of the Secret Service officers have been forced out, the agency is trying to permanently revoke the security clearance of one, and three others have been cleared of serious wrongdoing but will face administrative discipline.
A unique and highly effective oil-free, non-comedogenic, lightweight moisturizer for combination to oily skin.
Just bread and wine
I can't believe some of the things that teenage girls are wearing out in public.
I write down the days of the week on the scrap paper and under each day break it down into breakfast, lunch and dinner, make a note of the daily schedule items that affect the menu planning and make a note of these by the corresponding day.
Easily the one Eternal Wanderer wrote about a friend of his whose mother had just recently died - Memento Mori was the blog post. The friend's poignant words "Wala na si Nanay. Wala na akong masungit na ina." unexpectedly struck me, and I suddenly wanted to cry.
Color code the towels. I mean, unless you have it together enough for monograms! Do not rely on the placement of the towel (i.e. hooks or racks). All it takes is for two children to toss their towels on the floor and you are sunk. You do need hooks, because a towel that has dried a clean child will be fine for many days if it dries out completely between uses.
I am playing out some shit from past relationships on you. You have similar qualities as men I have dated who are noncommital and checked out. But also very kind and sensitive and sweet. I react to you in ways that have everything to do with my insecurities and baggage about men. Sometimes I am normal and friendly with you. Other times I am bitchy. Real weird.
The Department of Health has invited interested persons to comment on the draft regulations within a period of three months.
½ cup flour
7. When the brinjals are almost cooked, add the tamarind juice and jaggery and check for salt. If required, add accordingly. Boil in slow heat for a few more mins until the gravy thickens. Stir the mixture slowly to retain the shape of the brinjals.
Allowing the flowing
Now as you recall I've had my bad days with this pool also. Remember the Money Pit post? I think that summer I spent a cool six thousand on my pool! Quite of bit of dough for a little summer fun, don't you think? For us about every eight to ten years a liner is in order. That always seems to be our biggest expense. We tried one year to put it in ourselves and that was a disaster. It actually costed more money for someone to fix our mistake. This was a tough home repair lesson we've learned from. When it comes to pool liners, its best to let the experts do it.
Ink - Memento Tuxedo Black, Gypsy (CTMH), Copics
One of them felt the feathers, they were dry, they fluffed them up a little, stroked some smooth, time to go...
1. Go off by yourself. Jesus knew the importance of spending time alone with His Father. When He needed to listen, He would pull away from everyone. After Jesus fed the 5,000, He “climbed the mountain so (He) could be by himself and pray. He stayed there alone, late into the night” (Matt. 14:23).
I feel that I've not done Divergent the justice it deserves with this write-up. My heart still swells too much thinking about it and I know I want to re-read it soon. I'm linking to a few others here as I want to give you a taste of what others thought about it. Here is Zoe Marriott's review which I loved because, as a published writer, she has the opportunity to see the mechanics behind the story and yet, it did not put her off and she loves it. And this review is from The Booksmugglers whose opinions I value highly and then finally, a review from My words Ate Me (who may just have the coolest blog name EVER!) and who I don't know from a bar of soap, but would like to.
Tel Aviv University philosophy professor Asa Kasher co-authored the first IDF Code of Ethics and continues to work on the moral doctrines that shape the parameters of our army’s actions.
The make~believe world of a Stoned Cat on the Bar...
On a ancillary note, I am traveling to stop announcement links to new podcast episodes, at atomic for a while. Anyone who is absorbed should apperceive beyond to acquisition it (it's affiliated in this column and attainable on iTunes), and it's starting to become a bargain accompaniment if I'm too apathetic to blazon up an absolute article.
His parents thought he was working as a hair stylist on weekends. But when Prairie Grove, Ark., police responded to a 911 emergency call at 5 a.m. Sept. 26, they found 13-year-old Jesse Dirkhising on the floor, unconscious, near death, one of his wrists bound with duct tape. A half-hour later, he was pronounced dead at St. Mary's Hospital in Roger. A police investigation determined young Jesse was repeatedly raped over a period of hours, including with foreign objects. While enduring this ordeal, his ankles, knees and wrists were bound in duct tape and he was gagged and blindfolded. He was tied to a mattress. He may have been drugged, police say. A sedative called amitryptiline was found in the home of two men -- Joshua Brown, 22, and David Don Carpenter, 38 -- along with Jesse's body.
I laugh for you on demand,
In some spots you can glimpse the train tracks from the park’s previous life, not quite taken over by the carefully selected vegetation. Other areas have arena-style seating, water features and moveable sun loungers looking out to New Jersey and Lady Liberty. There’s food to feast on during your stroll, as well as art installations to ogle. But the real feast for your eyes is the city itself, which from here takes on an alternate appearance. It is not an aerial view but an elevated one: one that is a must-see for visitors and locals alike.
The recipe (found here) was painfully simple and made for a delightful summer dinner. All I did was substitute the arugula for buttercrunch lettuce and in the time it took my guy to clean up from afternoon yard work (he not as unmotivated as I apparently), dinner was on the table.
I’ve bored you enough, so I will now continue with my past two weeks selections. Oh, I forgot, I have thrown in a surprise drink (I don’t think I would have called it beer, but it is one nonetheless), and I shared it with my brother-in-law Jeremy. I even took a picture of him drinking it:
I am not going to narrate a plot from any thriller story or a horror movie. I am about to share one of my craziest fears of all times. The fear that ringing telephones (and even cellphones) fill me with. I am not very sure as to how or when it exactly started. But it has only grown with time.
If second-hand smoke is harmful, and I personally have come to accept that it is, if to a still uncertain extent, there is no way to protect the health of workers except to make the smoking ban uniform. Compromises are impossible to incorporate, and before someone asks, I opposed the New Albany council’s citywide ban (over-turned by mayoral veto in 2008) precisely because it was porous. If universality in my own place, or the entire city, means that I must give up my cherished cigars indoors, then so be it.
He lifted his hand to knock, and found it trembling.
24 cans of refrigerator biscuits
Continue until the chain is the length you want. Hint: make a shorter version if you want to create a bracelet.
as every fairy tale comes real
Last year was a time of soul-shattering loss, grief, and strange blessings. It was a time of despair and self-realization, transition and adjustment. But of course, you know all that — I’ve made no secret of my ordeal, chronicling every painful stage of my journey. Many people endure worse traumas than the death of a soul mate, and they continue living without whimpering, which has made me feel a bit self-indulgent and whiny with my grief bloggeries, yet that was never my intention. The impact of grief after a major loss seems to be one more thing that has been discounted in our discount culture, and I simply wanted to tell the truth.
The reason these sacred acts were removed:
What makes people feel understood?
But that fear becomes irrational when (as Jung would say) looked at in the ‘data’-prism, meaning a group. We must always look at the individual. All too easily we confuse criminals with a demographic rather than a psychographic. In stead of data, we should look at datum. It is more logical to look at the psychology of terrorists (as with all criminals) than by starting with a large group and working downwards.
Into this metaphysical airport would taxi
Timbuktu
gcd papers - paris night
runk Driver, S/T
Bankroll Management IV + Test
Personally, I enjoy military video games, paintball, and dodgeball. I think that if everyone could see these as positive experiences, there would be far less trouble with pent up aggression and violent outburst. Years back I was confronted on this stance. A few boys wanted to come over to my house and play video games. Before I even discussed the matter with them I made sure their parents were okay with the idea. While making plans for a get together, another boy overheard our plans and went to his father – I guess to tattle on me. The father was not happy and came to put me to the test, asking me how I could promote such violence in light of Philippians 4:8 (This verse would take a whole different article to adequately articulate). I asked him if he had a problem with paintball. He did. Knowing his boys, I asked if they were allowed to play with BB guns. He said yes, but they could only point them at animals (A profile of psychotic killers shows that they were violent toward animals not peers). I then asked him what his thoughts were on dodgeball. He didn’t seem to have a problem with that so I asked him why he would condone the equivalent of stoning. He didn’t have a response.
Tommorrow: abdominal strength and core conditioning
Consider violence. We are terribly concerned when someone slaps or punches someone else. A fight can get you into prison. And that is remarkable, because our prisons themselves, and the police who fill them, have been inordinately tolerant of their own violence over the years, and we have been pushing our fellow citizens toward police and prisons at an extraordinarily high rate (Weiss, 2010). This is not what one might expect from a population committed to nonviolence. Wealth does not seem to be getting us away from violence.
For the background, I used the distress inks to color and then stamped the flourish BG stamp using Picket fence distress stain. I clear embossed this lovely Lotus flower onto the pattern paper and then used distress ink for the depth. Lovely effect in real. To finish stamped the sentiment onto pattern paper and tied some twine and bling.
Merging local authorities. They’ve already done it in Greece, reducing its number of local authorities from 1,134 to 355 which saves €1.1bn annually. And in Spain they’re considering a reduction from 8,000 to 2,000 with the intention of generating savings of €10bn per annum. And what criteria are the Spanish considering? If a local authority has less than 10,000 people then that is merged with an adjoining authority. In Ireland, we have taken tentative steps towards cost-saving mergers – the merger of Limerick city and county should save €15-20m a year . A quick look at the top salaries and people to whom they are being paid, by local authority area in Ireland, might convince you of the rationale for more mergers.
Remember Rick Santelli whose rant on the economy was the impetus for the founding of the Tea Party? Here he is again. Still ranting.
they were standing on my stomach,
He turned out quite cute, if I do say so myself. I hung him haphazardly in the living room, in August, to see how he looked. Santa looked like it was too hot outside to have him on the wall. Now he is hanging comfortably in a closet... for another month or two. It felt great to get that quilt finished.
Dissident cases in jeopardy after ruling: gardaí Review of Finucane murder link to 1988 Gibraltar SAS shooting of IRA Sinn Féin delegation to meet Parades Commission regarding Armagh parade McFeely refuses to apologise for ‘Hitler’ jibes to Priory victims Spy’s identity cost wee Gordon his life Ex-IRA man wins extradition battle Memorial unveiled to murdered Massereene pair Three icons looked at anew Northern Irish Freedom Fight Turns Into Taxing Battle for U.K. Government United Ireland border poll ruled out by Paterson
It is something unique to Israel - this need we have to remember and honor the ones who made the next day possible. And so, on Wednesday, we will honor the tens of thousands of soldiers and civilians who have died in our wars, been murdered in terrorist attacks in the 64 years since Israel was re-established in our ancient and current homeland. It is an agonizing day - no entertainment places are open, one television station simply runs music and a slow listing of all the names of each soldier, each terror victim. Each year, the list moves just a little bit faster - so that all the names can be displayed within the 24 hour period.
Doesn’t seem like a lot? Trust me there’s a LOT of work to flesh these out and be effective. Till next time – now, go and reread The Farmer at War.
The dentist said that she's not worried about Connor's stubborn loose teeth unless his permanant teeth start coming in behind or in front of them, so that's a good thing too. We'll just have to see how long they hold on; it's been nearly five months now and they show no sign of falling out. Guess he's got to do everything in his own time!
I attended seminars, and threw myself so much into the learning that I became a teacher of the science of success, and how to create the results you want in life. I learned from a great many mentors – some practical skills, and some more spiritual, all of which have contributed to where I am today. Have I learned enough?
The lucky winner this month is......
The pursuit of truth, once the common ground of journalists and academics, was sustained as an intellectual tradition by classical liberal arts universities that taught formal logic as a method of deducing fact. Formal logic was devised by Plato, Socrates and Aristotle, championed by the Enlightenment freethinkers and revived by 20th- and 21st-century philosophers such as Bertrand Russell, Hannah Arendt and A.C. Grayling. The willingness to seek truth, the ability to deduce it and the courage to publish it are what make a citizen truly free. The philosophical and legal recognition of citizen freedoms, tempered by John Stuart Mill's principle of not causing harm to another, is what makes a state democratic. Regulating the free press in the manner recommended by the Finkelstein inquiry violates these principles.
By early 2003, in an attempt to house newly-arrived asylum seekers, the Labour government turned to private companies to use hotels and large estate homes as so-called induction centres.
It occurs to me that I best give a rundown on my gear and what I’m hauling. I have no idea how much it all weighs yet; my burning hamstrings say it weighs lots, my pride and arrogance say it’s not that bad.
Type System Version=Latest;
This is absolutely a book that moms of every age will relate to and enjoy immensely! I highly recommend it for Mother's Day or any other day of the year! It's that good!
Advani has found a way to get the edgy fare she lusts after. “Mumbai store Atosa keeps me clued in about the latest in fashion; they also send me shortlisted options, both clothing and jewellery, which I try on at home before making my purchase,” she reveals. The store bears the courier services cost too.
“Not hungry,” he said and rushed toward the door. He burst out onto the sidewalk and adjusted the pack onto his back. Suddenly it seemed as though a million eyes were on him. Running now he took a short cut through the alley and heard Bob Dylan’s song, “Man Of Constant Sorrow” in his head.
have a connection where I’m going..
Labels: SAPS
It’s been two weeks since my last post already? I was planning on doing an update at the end of each week for Screnzy, but I got a bit sick around posting time and wasn’t able to muster up the inspiration to update. Honestly, I’m still not feeling my best right now, but I’m here, so why not try to get the ball rolling and start a post? I suppose, first thing’s first, it’s time for an update on my Script Frenzy project.
Apparently, what we had is going around the whole county, so a lot of people are feeling like we did.
Taking no more time to think about what I lack.
Or maybe Dr. Pessimist really did believe what he said. (who knows what he was thinking)
See, one of my new favorite bloggers Shelly over at Cookies & Cups is having a Friday link-up party for her s’mores week. I am linking up. This means (hopefully) a bunch of people who don’t know me are actually going to be reading this post and visiting our blog. So if you’re new: Hi! Welcome! Come read about us and our food! And don’t judge the pictures too harshly. I just got a new camera so they will be better from here on out, promise.
Extras: We’re fans of the beer tour and the fact that you can – if you so choose – play skee-ball here.
Genre of books YA: suspense/adventure/romance
Through many a sharp defeat and many a crisis, often baffled,
Possible Cliches: Comparing sunset to fire or a burning sky; a reference term for late-in-life years; riding into the sunset; watching a sunset as a romantic catalyst
So, thinking ahead, I decided to buy the leeks and freeze them, so that I would have some later when I buy my blender! It's a great solution for when you want to save money on fruits and veggies but don't necessarily plan on eating them right away. All you need to do is:
Mr Young arrives back from wherever he’s been hiding.
Put 4 cups flour, remaining ¼ cup sugar, and the salt into the bowl of an electric mixer fitted with the paddle attachment. Add yeast mixture; mix on medium speed until combined. Add 8 eggs, 1 at a time, mixing well after each addition; mix until well combined, about 2 minutes. Replace paddle with dough hook. Mix on medium speed 2 minutes.
figured out that statutes, codes, rules and regulations are not law
Matt Blackstock – Matt is a learning professional who likes to produce. I keep up with his thoughts and ideas on his Virtual Lore blog.
Well, today I got home rather earlier than I normally do. I was tempted to head straight for my laptop as I do on almost a daily basis. Check my mail, my facebook and read a few of my bookmarked blogs. Like clockwork. But I didn’t; not today.
“You must be tired,” her silver-haired father called as she shook hands with Rex. Her pony-tail whipped behind her head as she turned to her father and said, “I’m not tired. Where’s Double-J?”
Well, at least I am looking hot in my INSANITY by GizzA, now if I could just fix this damn mascara and maybe brush my hair!
June 12 - Carl Gardner, pop vocalist (The Coasters), 83
An East Coast deli on the West Coast. Nice, but not all that hard to imagine. You just imitate, exactly, the best deli you've ever had in New York. But the decor? Also imitating New York, or your version of it. Tile and Formica. Goofy artwork on the walls. No pretensions (except to be a New York deli).
Garnish with fried cashews and cilantro.
Bed, upright chair, sixty-watt bulb, no hook
Only with the WordPress stats. I don’t really care too much about my numbers. It’s sort of a rebellion against my experience trying to market as a writer a couple years ago. Then numbers HAD to matter, and they were ALL that seemed to matter. Now I can say I’m casually journaling and not have to care about numbers. I am amused sometimes, though, at the search terms. For example, a couple weeks ago, someone found my post on Oliver Twist by Googling, “How does Oliver Twist end?” (Go to school, kid!) And my top post? Is Molly Bloom’s soliloquy. No one ever comments on it — by they ALL find it. Better than this blog for cracking the James Joyce code? SparkNotes, people. SparkNotes.
Procrastination catches up to you week.
Was the penalty a little harsh? Maybe. Was it the right move for Roger Goodell? Absolutely.
so, in making happiness not my goal but part of the melody - when i reach my end, i would have enjoyed the melody all along. this ... makes me very happy... very.
This music can suck a draught
Every time the internet returns (even if only for a moment), it’s a house-wide phenomenon. Jalal, my host brother, will come bounding into the room yelling “IL Y A L’CONNEXION! KATIE!!” And we’ll all sprint to our respective PCs or laptops and frantically reload our internet browsers and feverishly push the “GET MAIL!!!!” button on our respective Outlook or Mail applications. At least, that’s what I do.
The world didn’t end in war, famine, or natural disaster. There wasn’t a virus or an invasion of little green men from outer space. We were the ending and the beginning, our biology, our genes. Evolution changed our lives and destroyed our world. It split us down the middle. Us and them.
Labour has been accused of losing control of gun crime as new figures show a sharp rise in armed robberies.
BBQ Pork Sliders
I think that in 5 years the IP marketplace will continue to be built up by three sub-markets:
Or, rather, he has breathed his last. He’s laid out in his pontifical vestments, his hand being kissed by the cardinals. Once he’s dispatched that duty, Borgia draws Cesare aside and goes over a plan they’ve clearly had in place for a while: Cesare will leave the Vatican before it’s sealed for the conclave, and Borgia will send him messages via white dove regarding whom they need to buy off to secure the election. Cesare reminds his father that the church has a word for that—simony, and it’s seriously frowned upon, but Borgia says God will forgive them. Keep telling yourself that, Borgia. He firmly tells Cesare he won’t accept failure from either Cesare or his brother. Cesare promises they won’t fail him, and Borgia kisses him before sending him on his way.
you see a Shriner in a “Mall” selling whatever, give generously.
Now two groups they've very much wanted to avoid are after them-the law, in the form of veteran state investigator Kirk Stevens and hotshot young FBI agent Carla Windermere, and an organized-crime outfit looking for payback. As they all crisscross the country in deadly pursuit and a series of increasingly explosive confrontations, each of them is ultimately forced to recognize the truth: The true professionals, cop or criminal, are those who are willing to sacrifice . . . everything.
"He cheated, but only once! Evie Dexter has promised to forgive and forget, to put everything behind her and fiance Rob. And her efforts to absolve his sins are paying off: in the past ten days she's only called him a two-timing love rat eleven times. Thank goodness for her flourishing career as a tour guide. With trips to fashionable Dublin, in-vogue Marrakech, cool Amsterdam, and romantic Paris, what's not to love? So when she's offered a luxury visit to the sensual city of Venice, with its shifting silver canals and rose and vanilla hued architecture, Evie jumps at the chance. Four days in the city of light and love is just what she needs. The sumptuous Grand Hotel, the gondolas, the wine, the Italian men ...Who knows what could happen?"
While we're on the topic of thing that have been around for long ass times, let's talk about whores. Whoring is one of the oldest jobs in existence, even older than 'wiping grandpas ass.' What, you didn't have to do that as kids?
The chicks love it.
1. Aspergers is Easy to Spot
The following weekend features the second half of the Kanto Regional University Championships and the second round of regional corporate track championships, with the East Japan region weighing in as the toughest at the corporate level. Look also for the second edition of the Gifu Seiryu Half Marathon, where Mathathi and Kawauchi return as the top invited men. Overseas, with support from JRN Suehiro Ishikawa and Takahiro Yamanaka, teammates of 10000 m world champion Ibrahim Jeilan at Honda, will run the Great Manchester Run 10 km along with the likes Haile Gebrselassie (Ethiopia) and Patrick Makau (Kenya).
If I knew the truth and you knew the truth, 100% truth; we would have unconditional love for one another. We would have no choice. We could fully understand what everyone has gone through. We could spread good news, heal the sick, mend broken hearts, free prisoners, give sight to the blind, and give liberty to the oppressed. We would be fully operating in the spirit of love and in the center of truth. You are trying to tell me that would not be the ultimate cool!?! It’s too late for me; I am sold out.
Not once, not twice, but THREE TIMES A LADY.
We have an agreement - I work until 12pm every day (except Wednesday and Friday when I'm in the prison) and the afternoons are free for fun.
Went to the Yeovil craft meet on sunday and though i didnt finish anything apart from colouring a image(totally pooped to be honest) i had a fab time and managed to purchase some new craft goodies as we were above the craft shop :) so this is my new stash along with my new inks from oysterstamps
But tonight the stage is silent
A bit like the Miller Chill but nowhere near as bad in taste or concept, this is another example of a beer made by a marketing department rather than by a brewery. A supposed Pilsner – by calling it Pils, they got it half right – it falls short on a few counts. It uses Saaz hops, like a pilsner should, but they must’ve run out half way through. By all means use Saaz hops, but if you are only going to run them past the kettle for effect, then don’t suggest it’s a pilsner. As a result, the bitterness, or lack thereof, is a let down. It’s not a terrible beer but they really should have consulted a brewer before committing to a full production run. As a result, this beer goes down as a Marketing Oddity.
I have been trying to find one of these wire shelves at the thrift store for about 6 months. I have found a couple, but none that were under $1, which is my budget.
Have questions on the submission process? etc.
UNWTO said “A staggering one billion tourists, or one in seven of the world’s population, will travel abroad in 2012 – and the sector is expanding. While this expansion drives economic growth, job creation and development, there is evidence that…victims of trafficking are most often enslaved for sexual purposes, but they might also be found in kitchens or cleaning guesthouses, restaurants and bars.
Preparation is vital. Lennart(the owner) prepared Sjora well and had the necessary spares that we needed to keep her operating smoothly.
Ah yes, Brienne. Nobly born lady and a knight besides. But what’s with the Renly-Margaery-Loras triangle? Why do they need to beat us over the head with it? Some subtlety would be a welcome sop to the viewer’s intelligence. We don’t need everything spelled out for us. And with the rampant nudity in the series it’s not as if we’d miss one or two less bodies in their birthday suits. But back to Brienne. Do you suppose she’s actually that tall or is it a bit of technical trickery (a la Hagrid in the Harry Potter series)? This week’s intrigue, find out who to trust, or rather who not to. To that end, Tyrion tells three different people three different stories about an alliance he intends to make with his niece Myrcella’s future marriage. To Grand Maester Pycelle he says he’ll send the girl to House Martell of Dorne, to Varys he says it will be Theon Greyjoy and to Peter Baelish he declares Myrcella shall marry Robin Arryn, Lord of the Vale (whose father was Hand of the King before Ned Stark). It seemed a rather obvious ploy when I first read the book and came across no less so in the show, so I was surprised that it worked because each of these men consider themselves the height of intelligence. But I guess that old adage about con men being the easiest to con is, in this case at least, true. It is Pycelle who faces Tyrion’s judgement before the episode is up and finds himself in a black cell. And before the episode is up, Yoren is dead and Arya and Gendry, identities still unknown to captors and friends alike, are prisoners marching toward Harrenhall.
Some books I read since this summer that I haven't written about:
Arguably, Arsenal has the easiest remaining fixtures while Newcastle faces a tough stretch to the finish line.
I hear the prizes are very nice – and will include beaucoup LA-31 biere. While you are there look for my wife on the dance floor – her partner will be dancing like he has on Frankenstein’s boots.
Over the years, I haven't thought of too many sets as being "overrated". It took me a while to come up with one, but I probably should've thought of it a lot sooner.
Brenda's a bestie and I've known her forever. She married one of my very best high school friends (the very one that taught me the basics of photography all those years ago). So technically she's not a new friend, but she is a new blogger and one of the nicest people you'll ever meet. She has a scrapbooking blog and sent me the most beautiful card at Christmas. If we have any crafties amongs us check her out.
Trells Bells – Jordan Queen of LA
A special committee of the U of M Board of Regents is reviewing policies on executive compensation and administrative transitional leaves and hopes to make “minor” corrections, something regents have been considering for a couple of years.
-6 flour tortillas
To return to US fallout maps:
“There was a huge amount of debris that we were just covered in. There were chunks the size of golfballs that came back and hit you.”
I just can't do it. Yet I look away.
flexibly bending my doubts
Me: Make her a Hogwart's dessert.
So imagine my pleasure when I entered the ‘Miracles and Charms’ exhibition at the Wellcome, and galloped straight to a collection of amulets and talismans made by early twentieth-century folklorist, Edward Lovett. One metre into the exhibition, I saw that Lovett had been in Venice, hunting amulets. Discovering the story of the Venetian seahorse good-luck charms, he had commissioned some glass reproductions to be made for his collection. And there they were at the Wellcome in London, among four hundred of Lovett’s amulets, choreographed (the only word to express the grace of her work) by the artist Felicity Powell: ‘my’ glass seahorses dancing in a wave of coins, rabbit feet, carved shells and even a gondola ferro.
EDIT: I took out the "Donate" button because with that you can't actually see the progress bar go up... we're already over $160!!
How long does a deposition usually last?
For unto you is born this day in the city of David a Saviour, which is Christ the Lord.
Cartridge cases fired from these devices are seldom left on crime scenes, as the spent cartridge is not automatically ejected from the device.
earth between my ears.
So really, you don’t need to answer the question “who am I?” right away, or even explicitly at all. Most of us operate under a nom de plume anyway, the digital equivalent of trucker or ham radio “handles”, and that’s how we are known. That’s part of the beauty of this internet thing; I’m Tesh, the guy who writes this blog. My real name isn’t important, nor are silly things like skin color, weight, clothing, or any of the other superficial things that people are judged and prejudged by. My articles can stand on their own merit or lack thereof, my ideas and my writing have a purity of presentation that might not be possible in other venues. To be sure, there’s a sense of common courtesy and even subtle undercurrents of online politics and agendas that one may run afoul of, but for the most part, this blogging thing is remarkably clear of a lot of cruft that other modes of communication deal with. There’s just something… pristine about words on a “page” that makes for a nice philosophical playground.
This is great for an alternative to sugary juices for kids, but it also makes a really yummy hot tea. (Especially if you use red apples and then have a lovely pink brew!)
Barley Island Brewing Company, est. 1999
First of all, the Baltimore Beer Week Committee encourages you to travel (and drink) responsibly while partaking of Baltimore Beer Week. Do not drink and drive. Take a designated driver (many events have discounts and/or special deals for designated drivers), pool together to take a taxi or van, or ride public transit. If in doubt, call a cab or have one called for you--even a long taxi ride is cheaper than a car accident or arrest. Heck, hire a limo or van if you must--several limos showed up at Baltimore Beer Week events in 2009 and 2010!
So I made my own version of the bread using spelt flour which I flavoured with roasted garlic and rosemary. It was lovely, especially dipped into the oozing baked camembert.
1 tsp. ginger
This challenge is sponsored by Robyn's Fetish. They make awesome digi stamps and digi paper as well. Check them out and give them some Creative Card Crew love!
And at one point we tell you how you can win free wedding invitations, wedding favors and bridesmaid dresses through the show's sponsor weddingpaperdivas.com.
We all have limits. Sometimes our limits expand. Sometimes they contract. I know I can’t reach anything on the top shelves in my kitchen. Not even on my tippy toes. But, I can get a step stool to aid me in reaching the top shelf.
-1/2 tsp fennel
If you have a preferance for any one of those, go for a whole cup of your chosen varaity
